State Nursing Home Quality Improvement Programs: Site Visit and Synthesis Report APPENDIX A. State Reports __________________________________________________________________
TABLE OF CONTENTS
FLORIDA Overview of the Florida Visit A Brief Description of Florida's Nursing Home Industry Impetus for Florida's Quality Improvement Programs Overall Intent/Vision for Florida's Quality Improvement Programs Description of Quality Improvement Programs in Florida Funding: Quality of Long-Term Care Facility Improvement Trust Aspects of Florida's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to Work Well Aspects of Florida's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to be Less Successful Impact of Florida's Quality Improvement Programs on Quality of Life/Quality of Care Sustainability and Lessons Learned Role of the Federal Government in Quality Improvement Summary and Conclusions
IOWA Overview of the Iowa Site Visit A Brief Description of Iowa's Nursing Home Industry Impetus for Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs Overall Intent/Vision for Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs Description of Quality Improvement Programs in Iowa Aspects of Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs that Work Well Aspects of Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to be Less Successful Impact of Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs on Quality of Care/Quality of Life Sustainability and Lessons Learned Role of the Federal Government in Quality Improvement Summary and Conclusion References
MAINE Overview of the Maine Visit A Brief Description of Maine's Nursing Home Industry Impetus for Maine's Quality Improvement Program Overall Intent/Vision for Maine's Quality Improvement Programs Description of Quality Improvement Programs in Maine Aspects of Maine's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to Work Well Aspects of Maine's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to be Less Successful Impact of Maine's Quality Improvement Programs on Quality of Life/Quality of Care Sustainability and Lessons Learned Role of the Federal Government in Quality Improvement Summary and Conclusions References
MARYLAND Overview of the Maryland Site Visit A Brief Description of Maryland's Nursing Home Industry Impetus for QIPs Overall Intent/Vision for QIPs Description of State-Initiated Quality Improvement Programs in Maryland Aspects of QIPs that were Noted to Work Well Aspects of QIPs that were Notes to be Less Successful Impact of QIPs on Quality of Care and Quality of Life Sustainability and Lessons Learned Potential Role of the Federal Government in Quality Improvement and Barriers to Quality Imposed by the Federal Government Summary/Conclusions References
MISSOURI Overview of the Missouri Visit A Brief Description of Missouri's Nursing Home Industry Impetus for Missouri's Quality Improvement Programs Overall Intent/Vision for Missouri's Quality Improvement Programs Description of Quality Improvement Programs in Missouri Aspects of Missouri's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to Work Well Aspects of Missouri's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to be Less Successful Impact of Missouri's Quality Improvement Programs on Quality of Care/Quality of Life Sustainability and Lessons Learned Role of the Federal Government in Quality Improvement Summary and Conclusions References
TEXAS Overview of the Texas Site Visit A Brief Description of Texas' Nursing Home Industry Overall Intent/Vision for Quality Improvement Programs Description of State-Initiated Quality Improvement Programs in Texas Other Efforts Aspects of Quality Improvement Programs that were Noted to Work Well Aspects of Texas's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to be Less Successful Impact of Texas's Quality Improvement Programs on Quality of Life/Quality of Care Sustainability and Lessons Learned Role of the Federal Government in Quality Improvement Summary and Conclusions
WASHINGTON Overview of the Washington Site Visit A Brief Description of Washington's Nursing Home Industry Impetus for Washington's Quality Improvement Program Overall Intent/Vision for Washington's Quality Improvement Program Description of Quality Improvement Program in Washington Aspects of Washington's Quality Improvement Program that Work Well Aspects of Washington's Quality Improvement Program Noted to be Less Successful Impact of Washington's Quality Improvement Programs on Quality of Care/Quality of Life Sustainability and Lessons Learned Role of Federal Government in Quality Improvement Summary and Conclusions
NOTES
FLORIDA
Overview of the Florida Visit
This report describes our review of the nursing home quality improvement programs initiated by the State of Florida.
It begins with background information on the programs and how the visit and discussions were structured, and continues with a brief account of the origin and rationale for the programs.
A description of the programs follows, along with the research team's findings.
These findings are based on discussions with state employees, nursing facility respondents, and consumer representatives) regarding the perceived strengths and weaknesses of the programs.
A discussion of the impact these programs have had on the quality of life and quality of care of Florida's nursing home residents follows.
The report concludes with suggestions from program designers and participants to other states that might want to implement similar programs, a discussion of the sustainability of the various programs, and the respondents' opinions on the role of the Federal Government in quality improvement in nursing facilities.
Background
The study's Technical Advisory Group recommended that Florida be selected as a site visit state largely because of the state's Quality Monitoring program, a technical assistance program that was established in 1999.
The state also has numerous other quality improvement programs, including recognition and reward programs and training/education efforts.
In addition, the state has a public reporting system, risk management requirements, and mandated increases in minimum direct care staffing.
All of these measures stem from two legislative mandates--the first passed in 1999 (HB 1971), and the second, SB1202, which followed in 2001.
Each mandate was implemented in direct response to concerns regarding the quality of care in Florida nursing homes and the increase in the number of lawsuits filed against nursing homes.
Participants
Abt staff members Deborah Deitz and Donna Hurd accompanied by Jennie Harvell, project Task Order Officer (TOO), conducted discussions in Florida over a three-day period in September 2002, meeting with state survey agency staff, Medicaid staff and researchers, consumer advocates and provider association staff.
Researchers were also able to accompany a Quality Monitor on a facility visit and speak with facility staff about the Quality Monitor program.
The following individuals agreed to participate in discussions with the researchers: * Florida Agency for Health Care Administration (AHCA) + Susan Acker, RN, Ph.D.
Head of the Office of Standards and Quality + Barbara Alford, Head of the Long Term Care Quality Monitor Program + Donnah Heiburg, Head of the Tallahassee Field Office + Molly McKinstry, Manager Long Term Care Unit, Bureau of Health Facility Compliance + Sue Redd, Program Manager + Diane LoCastro RN, Quality Monitor
* Florida Health Care Association + William Phelen, Executive Director + Koko Okano, Health Services Research Analyst + LuMarie Polivka-West, Director of Quality and Policy Assurance + Debbie Afassano, RN, Assistant Director of Quality Assurance + Ann DeSilva + Providers from eight nursing facilities
* Florida Association of Homes for the Aging + Erwin P. Bodo, Ph.D., FAHA, COO, Senior Vice President of Reimbursement and Statistical Analysis + Andrea Lewis RN, Director of Regulations and Compliance + Providers from five nursing facilities
* Florida Medicaid + Kenneth L. Thurston, CPA, Assistant Deputy Secretary for Medicaid Finance + Brian Clark, Medicaid Cost Reimbursement + Nancy Ross, Ph.D., Chief, Medicaid Research Bureau + Lori Parham, Ph.D., Medicaid Research Bureau
* Consumer Advocates + Norma H. Atteberry, RN, BS, Geriatric Consultant/Educator + Victoria K. Fierro, CPA, Financial Consultant + Anna Spinella, Advocates committed to Improving Our Nursing (ACTION) + Barbara Hengstebeck, Coalition to Protect America's Elders + Lyn Bodiford, AARP
* Department of Elder Affairs + Martie Daemy, Interim State Ombudsman + Linda MacDonald M.S, Alzheimer Training Program, Senior Management Analyst II
* University of South Florida + Kathryn Hyer, DrPA, MPP, Director of the Training Academy on Aging at Florida Policy Exchange Center on Aging + Larry Polivka, Director of the Florida Policy Exchange Center on Aging + Debbie Hedgecock, Doctoral Student in Aging Studies + Christopher Johnson, Ph.D.
Because the provider associations were unable to schedule meetings with their members while the research team was in Florida, conference calls were scheduled in late September/early October to discuss Florida quality improvement programs with Florida Health Care Association and Florida Association of Homes for the Aging members.
Conference calls were also used for discussions with the Ombudsman and with staff from the Florida Policy Exchange Center on Aging at the University of South Florida.
Preparation
Prior to the on-site visit, information on the quality improvement program was gathered from a literature review, stakeholder discussions and the MyFlorida.com website.
Information on the following aspects of the programs was gathered and organized in a table: * Program title; * Program description; * Agency contact--the person(s) most knowledgeable about the program protocols and implementation to date; * Impetus--what prompted the development of the program; * Designer--identify the individual(s) or group(s) responsible for program design and indicate agency affiliation(s); * Goals--state the program objectives; * Funding Source and Amount--state current funding amounts/sources and projections for future periods; * Program Staff--indicate how many individuals are involved in the program implementation including administrative support, what is the organizational structure; * Facility Involvement--is this a requirement for all facilities or a voluntary program, how are facilities selected for inclusion, if voluntary? * Dates--what are the program beginning and end dates; and * Evaluation--indicate current and planned formal evaluation program(s).
The table was forwarded to the survey agency contact, Dr. Susan Acker, prior to the on-site visit for her to review and provide additional or corrected information.
The research team used the factual information in the tables as a starting point to develop interview questions that focused on more in-depth issues.
Letters of endorsement explaining the project goals, state selection and interview processes were sent to prospective interviewees.
Follow-up phone calls were made to arrange for convenient dates and times for interviews.
Structure
Meetings with the survey agency staff, provider associations staff members, Medicaid staff and researchers, consumer advocates and facility staff took place at their respective offices or on-site at the nursing facility and generally lasted one to two hours.
The research team met with the Quality Monitoring nurse at the facility and was able to interview her prior to observing the Quality Monitor visit.
Follow-up phone calls were made to participants who were not available to meet with the researchers while on site.
These were scheduled in late September/early October and conducted as conference calls with the Abt staff and the ASPE Task Order Officer.
A Brief Description of Florida's Nursing Home Industry
In order to compare Florida's nursing home industry with the other study states, we present some descriptive characteristics.
There are 734 facilities in Florida (AHCA web site) with 69,122 residents reported as of Spring 2001.
The average number of beds per facility is 114, which is slightly higher than the national average of 108.
The median occupancy rate per facility is 86.7 percent as compared to the national rate of 95.1 percent.
The percentage of for-profit homes in Florida is higher than other states, with 76 percent of homes operating for profit versus 65 percent nationally.
The not-for profit-homes are lower at 23 percent vs. the national average of 28 percent.
There are also fewer government-operated (2 percent vs. 7 percent) homes.
The majority of homes operate as part of a chain (70 percent vs. the national average of 55 percent) and 10 percent of facilities are hospital-based, which is slightly less than the national average of 12 percent.
The majority of homes are dually certified for Medicare and Medicaid (88 percent) as compared to the national average of 80 percent.
There are approximately 2400 assisted living facilities and 1100 home heath agencies.
(FPECA) (p. 17).
Impetus for Florida's Quality Improvement Programs
Florida's quality improvement programs are the result of legislation passed in 1999, 2000 and 2001.
Prior to the passage of the legislation, respondents explained that the atmosphere in the state was unsettled with a number of issues facing nursing home providers, regulators and consumers.
There was increasing concern with the quality of care in nursing facilities and how quality was to be defined and communicated to consumers.
In 1999, HB 1971 was passed, which included provisions for a technical assistance program, a quality recognition program, development of a website to post facility information for consumers, training programs and medical director standards.
In 2000 a minor bill was passed that revised the measures that would be posted on the website and modified the types of documentation required for the discharge and transfer of residents.
At the same time these actions were taken, there was increasing concern about rising rates of litigation against nursing facilities and the effects of litigation on facilities' financial stability.
Lawsuits had become common, affecting facilities regardless of their reputation for high or low quality care.
Facilities were reportedly paying 500-fold increases in insurance rates while other facilities were unable to secure any insurance.
During discussions with agency staff, it was stated that Florida ranked third in the nation for skilled nursing facility bankruptcies (behind Texas and California) and that Florida had 10 percent of the country's nursing home beds but 50 percent of the nursing home litigation.
In response to these concerns, lawmakers created a 19-member Task Force to study the affordability and availability of long term care in Florida.
The group was mandated to study and make recommendations on a number of issues pertaining to long-term care.
Those specific to quality of care were the following: * The extent to which the quality of care in long term care facilities in this state is compromised because of market changes that affect the financial stability of the long term care industry; * The kinds of incidents that lead to the filing of lawsuits and the extent to which frivolous lawsuits are filed, * The difference between the quality of care provided by for-profit skilled nursing facilities and by not-for-profit skilled nursing facilities * An evaluation of how the quality of care in long-term care facilities of this state compare with the quality of care in such facilities in other states.^1
The Florida Policy Exchange Center on Aging at the University of South Florida (FPECA) was named to provide staff support to the Task Force.
FPECA's research indicated that the number of lawsuits against Florida nursing homes had in fact dramatically increased, that insurance rates had been going up, that insurance companies were writing fewer policies and that consumers were complaining of poor quality of care and violation of residents' rights.
They studied risk management in hospitals and concluded that the institution of an internal risk management program in nursing facilities "could be an appropriate step...to bring about a comprehensive quality care approach.
Such a step could both encourage improved quality of care and remedy the prevailing litigious climate in the industry."^2
In a 700-page report, released in February 2001, the Task Force presented their findings on the major task areas including options for improving nursing home quality.
SB 1202 was signed into law in May 2001 based in part on the findings from the Task Force.
As part of the compromise between consumer advocates and industry representatives, consumers agreed to tort reform in the form of limiting the amount of settlements against long term care facilities on the condition that this was partnered with increased oversight on quality.
The quality improvement legislation contained the following components: * Altered the technical assistance program by increasing the number of monitor positions and expanding the role of the quality monitors to include oversight of the risk management program; * Instituted a requirement that every nursing facility have an internal risk management program which included tracking and reporting adverse incidents to the survey agency; * Increased the required minimum nurse staffing ratios; * Mandated additional training for caregivers; * Added regulations regarding Medical Directors and grievance procedures; * Required that the Nursing Home Watch List be released to consumers on a quarterly basis; and * Established the Medicaid Up and Out program.
The legislation was passed on May 15, 2001 and enacted immediately.
There was no period for facilities to prepare or for the State to develop interpretations of the bill.
Overall Intent/Vision for Florida's Quality Improvement Programs
The vision of Florida's quality improvement programs, as expressed upon the passage of SB 1202, was to bring about an improvement in quality of care through a combination of risk management and internal quality assurance along with increased oversight and guidance to facilities.
With liability insurance either unaffordable or not available, lawsuits affecting virtually all the long term entities in the state, and bankruptcies affecting 22 percent of skilled facilities, measures to deal with both the litigation crisis and quality of care problems in facilities were believed necessary to ensure the viability of the long term care industry in the state.
FPECA staff we spoke with expressed the idea that the Task Force sought to "marry" the issues of quality of care in nursing homes, liability and insurance and home and community-based care.
During our visit, there was much discussion among stakeholders regarding the relationship between quality improvement and risk management, and the relative importance of each component.
Providers stated that the quality of a nursing home had little effect on the number of lawsuits brought against it.
Consumer advocates expressed the opinion that it was "embarrassing" to think that controlling litigation would bring about quality improvement.
However, most participants expressed agreement with the Task Force that it was not appropriate to address the liability crisis separately from quality reforms.
Description of Quality Improvement Programs in Florida
Quality of Care Monitoring Program
In 1999, HB1971 established the Nursing Home Quality of Care Monitoring Program.
It was designed to "create a positive partnership between the Agency and nursing homes and ultimately yield improved quality of care to residents".
Initially the legislation called for yearly visits for monitoring of all facilities and quarterly for troubled facilities.
The program is funded primarily by general revenue, with some matching federal funds.
SB 1202 increased the number of monitors from 13 to 19 and mandated quarterly visits to all facilities, with additional visits based on high-risk factors.
Nursing homes that have been on the Nursing Home Watch List have the highest priority.
Second priority facilities are those that have a combination of the following: A history of non-compliance or "yo-yo" compliance; nursing homes that upon analysis of quality indicator reports reflect potential weaknesses; nursing homes that have either changed ownership, changed administrators or changed Director of Nursing Services recently; and all new facilities.
Quality of Care Monitors must be registered nurses licensed in Florida, preferably with surveyor experience, and be Surveyor Minimum Qualifications Test (SMQT) qualified.
Each monitor has a caseload of approximately 30 facilities assigned within a geographic area and each consults with other monitors on their area team who have particular areas of expertise.
Quality of Care Monitoring visits generally include touring the facility, observing residents and care providers in a variety of settings, as well as interviewing key staff, residents, and family who are present.
They were originally mandated to be unannounced, but this is no longer adhered to when risk management duties require meeting with the facility risk manager.
The visit may last anywhere from three hours to two days depending on the size of the facility and what a monitor finds.
During visits, monitors seek to identify, at an early stage, any conditions that are potentially detrimental to the health, safety, and welfare of nursing home residents.
Monitors may opt to identify a particular issue to focus on for a visit and not may discuss every triggered quality indicator.
They may also opt to focus on an issue that the facility has identified as a problem.
Monitors are careful not to endorse a particular process--they can provide guidance and references, but the process has to be one that the facility identifies.
They explained that their suggestions are very general.
They are careful not to say, "Do it this way".
They try "to keep the onus on the facility."
They state that the facility must adapt the process to meet the needs of their residents.
They offer educational resources and performance intervention models designed to improve care including materials available to share with facilities such as journal articles, websites and various protocols.
They share information about good practices they have seen in other facilities.
Monitors also interpret and clarify state and federal rules and regulations governing the facilities.
At the conclusion of each visit, the Quality of Care Monitor and the facility administrator meet to discuss findings.
The administrator is advised that a written summary will follow, but that it's not to be construed as evidence of compliance or non-compliance.
A copy is kept on file with the Agency and one is given to the nursing home so both can track progress.
While the focus of the program is early detection, mandatory reporting of conditions which threaten the health or safety of a resident is required.
Any such findings are officially reported to the Agency for regulatory action and, as appropriate or required by law, to law enforcement, adult protective services or other responsible agencies.
Since May 2002, monitors have also been given the responsibility to assess the operations of internal quality improvement, risk management programs and adverse incident reports.
In addition, the Quality of Care Monitors collaborate and coordinate with the Field Office Managers in visiting facilities that are being financially monitored, closing, or in immediate jeopardy, to ensure the health and safety of residents.
Monitors attend survey field office staff meetings and coordinate with the field office staff during a jeopardy situation.
They also assist with training new surveyors.
Gold Seal Program
This program highlights facilities that provide superior care, creating a benchmark for others to strive to meet.
The program was mandated by HB 1976, developed and implemented by the Governor's Panel on Excellence in Long-Term Care, and operates under the authority of the Executive Office of the Governor.
The program was initiated in August 17, 2001 and the first awards were presented 7/24/02.
A total of 10 "Gold Seals" have now been awarded.
A nursing facility is eligible for Gold Seal consideration if it has been licensed and operated for at least 30 months, has not been rated "conditional" within that period and has had no Class I or Class II deficiencies within the previous 30 months of application.
The facility must also have "financial soundness and stability" as evidenced by a financial audit.
The legislation requires a Gold Seal facility to have an "outstanding record regarding the number and types of substantiated complaints reported to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Council within the previous 30 months."
In addition, Gold Seal facilities must have a stable workforce with low turnover rates.
Early Warning/Rapid Response Teams
The Early Warning System sends surveyors on unannounced facility visits to identify facilities with financial or quality of care problems.
Rapid response teams visit facilities identified by the early warning system.
It is illegal for anyone to warn a facility of an unannounced inspection visit.
These visits may be on nights, weekends, and holidays.
They may also visit facilities that request assistance.
They are not deployed for the purpose of helping a facility prepare for a regular survey.
AHCA investigates serious quality of care complaints for residents still in a facility with a current conditional rating, or under special appraisal review within 72 hours from intake (previous policy--within 90 days).
AHCA also changed the process for all other complaints against homes with a current conditional rating or under appraisal review by investigating within 10 days instead of within 90 days.
Risk Management/Internal Quality Assurance
SB 1202 mandated that every facility establish an internal risk management and quality assurance program with a risk manager responsible for implementation and oversight.
The regulation does not require that the risk manager have particular credentials.
Each facility must also form a risk management and quality assurance committee consisting of the facility risk manager, the administrator, the director of nursing, the medical director, and at least three other members of the facility staff.
This committee shall meet at least monthly.
The statutory language contains specific duties for this committee, including a process for reporting adverse incidents to AHCA.
The goal is to identify incidents occurring in health care facilities, which have an outcome of patient injury and may reflect error in the course of the delivery of health care services.
As mandated in SB1202, each facility must also establish a grievance procedure and must respond to all grievances within a reasonable time after submission to the facility.
This procedure must be available to all residents and families and must include: an explanation of how to pursue redress of a grievance; the names, job titles and telephone numbers of the employees responsible for implementing the grievance procedure; the address and toll free telephone numbers of the Ombudsman and AHCA; a simple description of how a resident may, at any time, contact the toll free numbers to report an unresolved grievance; and a procedure to assist residents who cannot prepare a written grievance without help.
A facility must maintain records of all grievances and must report to AHCA annually the total number of grievances handled, a categorization of the cases underlying the grievances and the final disposition of the grievances.
Medicaid Up and Out
This was an initiative of Senator Locke Burt and was passed as part of SB1202.
He was interested in replicating the Medicare HMO program Evercare for Medicaid patients in poor-performing nursing homes.
The idea was to provide improved primary care for individual patients via a nurse practitioner who works with the Medical Director, the primary physician and the family to provide intensive case management.
The program has never been put into place.
It was funded for $3 million dollars in 2001, but the funding was cut to $100K annually at the end of that legislative session.
Evercare has provided a proposal which the State is reviewing.
The proposal is in question because some are skeptical regarding whether implementation of the intervention at the individual level really will affect quality at the facility level.
Evercare's reports show an improvement in some QIs, but not across the board.
The State is unsure about how much latitude they have in spending the money and whether the proposal will be modified or eliminated.
Teaching Nursing Homes
Florida's Teaching Nursing Home (TNH) program was created in 1999 via State of Florida bill HB1971 and was funded in 2000 to establish an integrated long term care training curriculum for physicians and initiate an online geriatrics university.
It is a statewide program coordinated by Dr. Bernie Roos, Director of the Stein Gerontological Institute of the Miami Jewish Home and administered by Richard Kelly of the Agency for Health Care Administration.
SB1202 provided $700,000 for the Teaching Nursing Home Project at Miami Jewish Home and Hospital for the Aged at Douglas The 2001 Florida Legislature also allocated $100,000 to fund River Garden Hebrew Home/Wolfson Health 
To assist in this effort, River Garden has engaged the University of Florida Institute on Aging.
To date, the TNH has produced a CD-ROM for LPNs on care of patients with Alzheimer Disease and related disorders.
See Appendix E for more details on the state's Teaching Nursing Home Program.
Alzheimer Training
SB1202 required that nursing homes provide Department of Elder Affairs (DOEA) approved Alzheimer's disease training to specified employees.
The Alzheimer's Association was at the table at the LTC task force and advocated strongly for this initiative.
The goal is to provide a very basic understanding, information and working knowledge of how to work with Alzheimer Disease and related dementia populations.
As a condition of licensure, facilities must provide to each of their employees, upon beginning employment, basic written information about interacting with persons with Alzheimer's disease or a related disorder.
All employees who are expected to have direct contact with residents with Alzheimer's Disease must have one hour of training within three months of employment.
All individuals who provide direct care must have an additional three hours of training within nine months of employment.
If facilities are not in compliance with this, they will be cited by surveyors.
The rule published in February 2002 identifies the qualifications of the trainer They must have a Bachelor's Degree in health care, geriatrics or human services, or hold a license as an RN and possess one of the following three 1) teaching experience of caregivers or 2) have at least one year practical experience working with Alzheimer patients/related dementias or 3) have completed specialized training from a university or accredited program.
A Masters Degree could substitute for the training experience.
The Director of Nursing or the training coordinator usually functions as the trainer.
All nursing home Alzheimer's disease training providers and curricula must be submitted to DOEA's contractor, the University of South Florida, Florida Policy Exchange Center on Aging (FPECA).
Curricula are developed by the facilities--some are based on the old state curriculum with some updates.
USF/FPECA reviewed over 1,000 applications from trainers in the first 30 days of the program for approval.
Many of the proposed training programs contained incorrect or out-of-date information (example: inappropriate meds) and had to be returned to facilities for correction and resubmission.
The curricula must also be resubmitted every three years.
Currently 130 different curricula have been approved.
The website lists approved providers and curricula.
DOEA receives $100K from general funds per year to administer the program.
Nursing homes were very concerned about the fiscal impact of this mandate since nursing facilities have to bear all the costs associated with training.
A state official indicated funding for the initiative could be in trouble because the industry feels that the government should not be in the business of approving training and curricula.
The legislature is also going to want to know whether the training is effective.
Right now, the only evidence is the review of the curricula itself which showed that many of the proposed training programs contained incorrect or out-of-date information.
More information on the state's Alzheimer Training program can be found in Appendix D, which contains the Florida Steering Committee's Consensus Document of Core Competencies for Dementia Training of Licensed Practical Nurses (LPNs) in Long-Term Care.
The Nursing Home Guide
Florida's Nursing Home Guide is part of AHCA's effort to provide information to consumers and allows a search for a nursing home by geographic region or by the characteristics of the nursing homes.
Descriptive information about the facility is provided, as well as the facility's performance on past inspections as represented by stars.
Under the stars is a link "Inspection Details for this Facility", which links to a listing of the facility's citations over the past 45 months.
Clicking on any citation links to a fuller explanation of that citation.
The publication provides detailed information about each of Florida's nearly 700 licensed skilled nursing facilities, including location, ownership, number of beds, types of special services offered and the lowest daily charge.
AHCA officials said they decided not to post the Quality Indicators out of concern that they were too confusing to residents and families.
The web version has links to the facility inspection history and performance measures, based on geographical location.
The electronic version is scheduled to be updated every quarter, although this has been difficult to accomplish.
Appendix C shows the information contained in the Nursing Home Guide for a sample facility.
The Nursing Home Watch List
The Florida Nursing Home Watch List is published by the AHCA to assist consumers in evaluating the quality of nursing home care in Florida (see Appendix C for an excerpt of the most recent Watch List).
The Watch List reflects facilities that met the criteria for a conditional status, on any day, on a quarterly basis.
A conditional status indicates that a facility did not meet, or correct upon follow-up, minimum standards at the time of an annual or complaint inspection.
The Watch List also lists all facilities that are in bankruptcy.
AHCA mails a copy to each nursing facility where it must be posted in a prominent place accessible to all residents and to the general public.
It is also mailed to assisted living facilities, hospital discharge planners, Ombudsmen, legislators and others upon request.
All copies are also maintained on the AHCA website.
The Watch List is also posted on-line at http://www.fdhc.state.fl.us/Nursing_Home_Guide/pdf/nhup0403.pdf.
Funding: Quality of Long-Term Care Facility Improvement Trust Fund
The Quality of Care monitor program is funded through a Quality of Long-Term Care Facility Improvement Trust Fund that, in 2001, was created within the state's Agency for Health Care Administration.
The trust fund supports activities and programs directly related to the care of nursing home and assisted living facility residents, and is funded through a combination of general revenues and 50 percent of any punitive damages awarded as part of a lawsuit against nursing homes or related health care facilities (Florida law 400.0238).
Monies in the fund come from a percentage of punitive awards in nursing home and ALF court awards, gifts, endowments and other legal charitable contributions, along with specific appropriations by the Legislature.
According to the legislation that created the trust fund, expenditures from the trust fund can be made for direct support of the following: * Development and operation of a mentoring program for increasing the competence, professionalism, and career preparation of long-term care facility direct care staff, including nurses, nursing assistants, and social service and dietary personnel.
* Development and implementation of specialized training programs for long-term care facility personnel who provide direct care for residents with Alzheimer's Disease and other dementias, residents at risk of developing pressure sores, and residents with special nutrition and hydration needs.
* Provision of economic and other incentives to enhance the stability and career development of the nursing home direct care workforce, including paid sabbaticals for exemplary direct care career staff to visit facilities throughout the state to train and motivate younger workers to commit to careers in long-term care.
* Promotion and support for the formation and active involvement of resident and family councils in the improvement of nursing home care.
For FY 2001-2003, the total cost of the state's Quality Monitoring program is about $1.65 million--this includes $1,395,911 for the quality monitors and $261,000 for other expenses.
The legislation authorizing the quality monitor program also increased licensing fees for facilities (from $35 to $50 per bed), and this increase covered part of the costs of the TA program.^3
Costs for other Florida quality improvement programs that were funded under Senate Bill 1202 (2001) are as follows: nursing home risk management and quality assurance program: $2.1 million in FY 2001-02 and $1.54 million in FY 2002-03.
(This includes costs of about $450,000 for data system development) and staff costs; Nursing Home Care Alzheimer's training: $10.5 million in FY 2001-02 and $6.8 million in FY 2002-03; surveyor training: $66,000 (in both FY 2001-02 and FY 2002-03).
The risk management program is paid for entirely by state funds, but federal funds cover more than 50 percent of the funding for the state's Alzheimer's Training Program, under which dementia-specific training is provided to staff who care for residents with Alzheimer's Disease.^4
Aspects of Florida's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to Work Well
Some provider representatives asserted that the Quality Monitors, Gold Seal and Risk Management are programs that have impacted the quality of care in their facilities.
Although opinion on the value of the Quality Monitor program was mixed, some provider representatives expressed that they found the visits to be very helpful, describing them as providing objective non-punitive advice.
Providers also appreciate the Quality Monitors sharing information on best practices, recommending educational materials and offering interpretation and clarification of state and Federal rules and regulations.
The Gold Seal program was seen by some as a good marketing device that potentially can decrease the cost of liability insurance and drive up revenues.
Consumer advocates praised the fact that it requires a financial audit.
Participants reported that the Risk Management requirement had forced them to investigate incidents and accidents in greater detail, examine their facility processes for flawed practices, and make changes with the goal to prevent future problems.
Educational training programs including the Teaching Nursing Homes and Alzheimer Training were described as useful by several of the provider representatives with whom we spoke.
Providers felt that the Alzheimer Training was most useful for non-nursing staff and for facilities that did not have a designated ADRD unit.
The approval process for trainers and curricula for the Alzheimer Training program is considered innovative.
Each submitted curricula is reviewed by a doctoral-level staff member at the Florida Policy Exchange Center on Aging at the University of South Florida.
Many of the curricula as initially submitted, contained incorrect or out-of-date information and had to be returned to facilities for correction and resubmission.
Although providers were aware of the compact disc developed for LPNs on Alzheimer's disease as part of the Teaching Nursing Homes program, and were pleased that it would be web disseminated, most indicated that they had not personally reviewed it.
Some discussion participants approved of the state's web-based Nursing Home Guide, particularly the star assessment system.
FAHA staff and providers expressed that the star system does a reasonable job with some expressing the opinion that it does a better job of evaluating quality than the CMS Nursing Home Compare site.
Discussants also commented on the mandated staffing increases, noting that the gradual mandated nursing assistant staffing increases were seen as more reasonable than one large increase.
Advocates were pleased that SB1202 created language to link facilities in large chains so that a staffing problem in one facility of a chain is viewed by the State as non-compliance across all the homes in the chain.
Aspects of Florida's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to be Less Successful
Although some discussion participants praised the Quality Monitoring program, consumer advocates voiced some concerns, primarily because of the changes that were made to the original role and responsibilities as laid out in HB 1971 in 1999.
The program as initially enacted was seen as separate from the survey agency and allowed the monitors to focus on the more problematic facilities.
In SB1202, the quality monitors' roles and responsibilities were expanded.
It required the Quality Monitors to provide quarterly visits to each facility in his/her region, oversee the risk management program, verify that facilities were meeting the minimum staffing requirements and perform various surveyor activities as needed.
Quality monitors are now responsible for monitoring facilities that were closing or in immediate jeopardy and provide orientation for new surveyors.
By taking on surveyor tasks, the separation between quality monitoring and enforcement became less distinct.
Provider association members reported that since the Quality Monitors are seen more as part of the risk management effort now, providers rarely think anymore about how they can use them for quality improvement.
Consumer advocates were concerned that the close ties between Quality Monitors and surveyors would lead to one group putting pressure on the other so that the information they presented about facilities was consistent between them.
For example, a poor survey outcome could lead to the conclusion that the Quality Monitor was not providing effective oversight.
There was some concern expressed that Quality Monitors hired as a result of SB 1202 were not as qualified as the former surveyors hired in the first round, and that there was great variability in the quality of quality monitoring depending on region of the state.
Providers noted that often they were asked to provide information for the Quality Monitors who did not necessarily have a background in long term care.
They also stated that a problem existed with inconsistency between information being disseminated by Quality Monitors and surveyors.
Some providers complained that visits were not occurring on a quarterly basis because of Quality Monitors being overwhelmed and the position experiencing high turnover rates.
They also noted that often a survey followed a quality monitoring visit, focusing on the same issues that the monitor had raised, causing them to question whether the Quality Monitors were maintaining confidentiality of the visits.
Consumer advocates objected to the promotion of the best surveyors out of the enforcement agency, saying it weakened survey.
They also stated that they did not agree that taxpayer funds should be used to provide advice to multi-facility chains on how to deliver care, likening it to the government providing training to Fed-Ex on how to deliver packages on time.
They agreed that small, independent facilities often needed and should be entitled to such support, but it made more sense to shut down large for-profit chains if they provided poor quality care to residents.
Concern was also expressed that because Quality Monitors must now oversee the risk management programs, visits are no longer always unannounced, since the Quality Monitor must meet with the facility's designated risk manager.
Respondents were critical of the Gold Seal program because the strict criteria eliminated the majority of facilities.
The expense of a financial audit, which is required, was also a negative.
Providers noted that there was not much incentive to seek a Gold Seal, as there was no change to the survey cycle, no immunity from lawsuits and no change in reimbursement.
Although some facilities praised the risk management process as teaching them how to critically evaluate their protocols, the reporting of adverse incidents and the confusion around the reporting requirements has put providers in a difficult situation.
Facilities have been over reporting adverse incidents because they have trouble identifying incidents that are in their control and because the stakes for not reporting are so high.
The failure to report an adverse incident to the survey agency can result in a G-level deficiency.
A G-level deficiency citation results in placement on the Watch list.
Two G-level deficiency citations may result in a six-month survey cycle and imposition of fines.
Reporting of adverse incidents was intended to distinguish better performing facilities from problem facilities, thus encouraging insurance companies to come back into the state.
In part because of the over-reporting issue, however, no progress has been made in improving the insurance situation.
Participants also noted that no credentials or qualifications were mandated for the facility risk manager.
Requiring credentialing was seen as one way to improve the program.
Both the Nursing Home Watch List and Nursing Home Guide are based on survey outcomes and were thus criticized because of the recognized inconsistency of survey results.
Participants noted that information in both areas was often not available in a timely manner.
The website star system is based on 45 months of data and participants noted that, "a lot can happen in 45 months."
Consumer advocates did not agree with the star system, maintaining that giving the worst facilities in the state even a one-star rating was misleading.
They also did not agree with the agency's practice of not posting information until appeals had been resolved.
Advocates also recommended that the website should contain information on lawsuits and fines.
Providers also noted that Florida consumers now have access to three types of sites with nursing home quality of care information--the CMS site, the proprietary sites and the AHCA site.
Since information varies from site to site, they use different ratings, and show different levels of compliance, they question how this helps consumers.
Providers were very concerned that the mandated increase in nurse aide staffing to 2.9 ppd (due in January 2004) is going to be virtually impossible to attain.
They are concerned that it will force facilities to compete with one another by offering bonuses and incentives.
There was disagreement as to the adequacy of the workforce needed to meet the future requirements.
Consumer advocates stated that there were plenty of nurse aides available in the state, with 250,000 on the registry and 10,000 new grads each year.
They saw nurse aide shortages as the result of the poor conditions, benefit and pay provided by facilities and stated that improving working conditions and giving nurse aides 40 hour work weeks would go a long way to remedying the situation.
Provider representatives, however, said that there was not an adequate supply to meet the demand "without significant wage pressure."
Two-thirds of Florida's nursing homes are paid for by Medicaid and they will not be able to increase wages to engage in competition for employees.
Provider representatives also noted that they would like the State to relax the requirement that facilities self-impose an admission moratorium when unable to meet the staffing minimums.
They would also like to see the staffing requirement relaxed for smaller facilities.
Facilities are being forced to use temporary agency staff to meet the requirements.
The cost is prohibitive and providers complain that they are not being reimbursed for it.
They also fear that the legislature will not pass the funding necessary to increase the nurse aide hours, but that facilities will still be expected to meet the required staffing minimums.
Consumer advocates noted that they would prefer that staffing minimums be designated by shift rather than for a 24 hour period.
They are also concerned that the industry circumvents the staffing requirements by shifting tasks and duties to nursing assistants.
Provider association staff also expressed concern that some facilities were eliminating housekeeping positions and shifting housekeeping duties to nursing assistants.
Impact of Florida's Quality Improvement Programs on Quality of Life/Quality of Care
No formal evaluation of Florida's quality improvement programs has been performed to date.
AHCA staff reported that they are interested in evaluating the success of the programs, particularly the TA component.
However, because the programs have been operating only a short time, it is not yet possible to evaluate their impact.
Because many of the programs were implemented simultaneously, it will be difficult to measure improvement or to attribute improvement solely to any one program.
Uncertainty about appropriate measures also makes the evaluation complicated.
A decrease in the number of deficiencies cited, a decrease in overall scope and severity, or a decrease in the number of citations have been considered as possible measures by AHCA, but none is yet considered to be reliable.
AHCA has been tracking liability claims and reported that they have been tapering off since they peaked in October 2001 (which was the deadline for all claims).
They produce an annual report on adverse events and survey citations, which was due to be published in December 2002.
They stated that they have not seen big changes in the aggregate of deficiencies, but that it is too early to see changes especially those that would be related to the passage of SB1202.
Agency staff are also aware of the impact staff turnover both at facilities and within the TA program has had on program effectiveness and sustainability, making them hesitant to begin an evaluation that does not take turnover into account.
Facility staff turnover was described as being particularly concerning, with some QMs reporting that they were seeing a new Director of Nursing at each facility visit, and finding that QM reports and recommendations were often lost in the transition.
Dr. Acker stated that anecdotal evidence indicates the TA program is having positive effects, however.
As described in the previous section, many providers we spoke to noted that they felt that the quality of care in their facilities had improved as a direct result of the visits.
AHCA also has received positive feedback from surveys and feedback forms used to gauge the success of the Quality Monitoring program.
They have conducted two surveys--one with field office managers on the relationship between monitors and field office staff, and one with providers on the value of the monitor program.
AHCA also receives feedback from facility staff in the form of a paper questionnaire given to facility staff at the end of a visit, asking facilities to provide information rating the performance of the TA staff and how helpful the visit had been.
Most comments have been complimentary, with observations such as the visits were helpful and that staff at facilities were pleased to have someone to ask when questions arose.
However, at the time of our visit, AHCA was revising the form and hadn't used it for six months.
Some providers we spoke with also said that they are reluctant to offer criticism on the questionnaire for fear that there could be negative repercussions from a Quality Monitoring staff that increasingly has ties with the survey process.
Regarding the Gold Seal Program, many comments we heard from providers and consumer advocates indicated they thought the program probably was unlikely to affect quality.
Some stakeholders voiced the opinion that the award was primarily a marketing tool which may become increasingly relevant when bed occupancy is lower.
They felt that the greatest impact may be on those facilities on the cusp of providing higher quality care which are deciding whether to make the investments that quality improvement requires.
For those facilities, the Gold Seal program could make a positive difference.
Assessing the value of the Alzheimer training program, most stakeholders said they thought it provides good information, and that it is was most likely to have a positive impact for nursing aides and for facilities that do not have a specific dementia care unit.
But some expressed the opinion that facilities would benefit more from being able to choose for themselves the training that would most benefit their facility.
And some said mandatory training felt more like a "big brother is watching" regulatory approach than a valuable educational program that improved quality of care.
Florida's web-based public reporting program was considered sufficiently valuable by consumer representatives that they said they thought that every state should have one.
But a number of stakeholders stated their belief that a several factors were currently limiting its impact on quality improvement.
They thought that consumers frequently do not know that the Guides and Watch List exist, may not have internet access, or may not be proficient in navigating the internet.
Some provider representatives also noted that some facilities have been on the Watch List many times, and that this does not appear to have provided sufficient motivation for those facilities to do a better job.
Stakeholders said that they believe public reporting of deficiencies can improve quality of care provided by stimulating competition and sparking change in facility culture.
However, one provider representative stated that since 90 percent of admissions come from the hospital, the discharge planner has the greatest influence on where patients go, rather than a family member who had taken the opportunity to review quality ratings.
He posited that as consumers become more computer savvy, interest and impact will increase--and that would make facilities be more concerned about how they look on the public reporting website.
Opinions varied about whether the mandated increases in staffing had impacted quality.
Some providers said they spent a huge amount of time and money on this issue and it had not made any impact on quality.
Another said the belief that by increasing staffing, turnover will be decreased, and that increased staffing creates more flexibility, increases the ratio of staff to residents and improves the quality of life for the residents by allowing staff able to spend more time with them.
As with all of Florida's quality initiatives, the impact of the risk management program has not yet been formally evaluated.
AHCA staff and provider representatives reported that the number of lawsuits has declined, but it is impossible to know whether this is due to improved quality processes, or whether the number of facilities "going bare" (operating without liability insurance) has made the state's facilities less attractive targets for litigation.
Regardless, several providers expressed the belief that the risk management program had been one of the quality initiatives that had the greatest impact on nursing home quality of care.
They reported that at first there was resistance to changes such as monthly meetings of the risk management committee, but they now see it as very useful.
"It forces us to keep focused."
One provider reported that they now do a lot of education around risk management with staff.
When staff understand the goals, they stated that their participation and openness increases and they are less defensive.
Another provider said that the way that they investigate bruises has changed dramatically since the risk management program was instituted and that how they do their investigation has impacted quality on each nursing unit in their facility.
Sustainability and Lessons Learned
Currently, funding for Florida's quality improvement programs comes from general revenue and licensure fees with some federal funding.
AHCA staff noted that there is general support for quality initiatives among members of the legislature.
Other state agency officials offered that there has been a focus on seniors, primarily because of the large elderly population, and that the governor and the legislature are committed to seniors' issues.
State agency staff also noted that the programs are up for review every year and that the funding for the both the Medicaid Up and Out program and for the Consumer Satisfaction survey have been cut, and that continued support may be tied to demonstration of positive outcomes in the future.
We asked providers, state program administrators, and consumer representatives we spoke with in Florida for lessons they have learned and any recommendations they wished to offer other states considering quality improvement programs.
Nearly all we spoke to would recommend the Quality Monitor program, which was generally characterized as having a positive impact on facility quality of care.
Quality Monitors have been able to establish a more collaborative, less adversarial relationship with nursing facilities than is typical for surveyors, and this relationship allows providers the opportunity to have an open dialogue with TA staff about problems and issues in resident's care, to obtain information on good clinical care practices, and to receive feedback on how they can improve their care processes.
Some stakeholders felt the intervention should be targeted either to the smaller free-standing facilities with no corporate support, or to facilities that were having more problems.
Most providers said they wanted to see the program continue, remain confidential and separate from survey.
They especially wanted the content of the visits not to be shared with surveyors or to be available for litigation.
Most said they would prefer that the QM staff not overlap with survey staff--they should be kept entirely separate.
However, some providers said that surveyors and Quality Monitors should be trained to provide consistent guidance, and felt that TA staff with past survey experience were most valuable in helping them interpret applicable regulations.
All agreed that Quality Monitors needed to be well qualified and experienced in long-term care.
Discussants also had recommendations on several of the other quality improvement programs Florida has initiated.
Consumer advocates supported the public reporting website as important for consumer decision-making.
They believed that the algorithm for ranking facilities is good, but they don't like the fact that every facility gets a star regardless of how low its quality rating is, and would prefer a numeric ranking.
Provider representatives recommended that the website resolve problems associated with the reporting of 45 months of survey and deficiency information by showing current performance alongside historical performance.
They also thought that regular updating was critical for accurate representation of facilities.
Regarding the Gold Seal program, participants thought it important to ensure that there is a well-defined consumer advocate position on the selection panel and that the panel performs an on-site inspection of any facility being considered for an award.
They also stated that the awards should be reserved for facilities that were truly doing something special for residents and not merely meeting minimum criteria.
Provider representatives noted that there is a need for rewards beyond public recognition that make the Gold Seal worth pursuing and that in order to have an impact, it had to be more attainable for more facilities.
Finally, numerous stakeholders reported that the risk management program has real potential for prevention, managing losses and minimizing litigation and that it was helping facilities focus on how best to prevent adverse incidents.
Role of the Federal Government in Quality Improvement
Much of the feedback aimed at the Federal Government concerned the issue of reimbursement.
One provider representative summed it up by saying that "You cannot separate money from care," and that Medicare and Medicaid programs have to pay reasonably for reasonable care.
There has to be more emphasis on alternative care (home care, assisted living) to really decrease the financial pressure on nursing homes.
Some providers expressed concerns about some of CMS' policies on quality measures.
For example, Florida has low restraint use, but high fall rates.
Providers believe that CMS is not looking at how one area of care impacts another and about interdependencies like the relationship between restraint use and falls.
They also described problems with CMS classifying resident-to-resident altercations and that special considerations needed to be made for special populations like dementia and head injury patients where they have no alternatives for placement.
State agency staff attempting to look at disease management outcomes and measure resource use said they wish that is was easier to access MDS data and resource use for dually eligible patients.
Providers also expressed a need for the Federal Government to take a stronger role in the development of best practice recommendations.
"We wish we still had AHCPR to do best practices.
They were impartial and the information came from researchers and evaluators--not surveyors."
Similar direction was sought on end of life care issues, unavoidable decline and the management of expectations of patients and families about realistic outcomes of nursing home care.
Summary and Conclusions
Since 1999, Florida has established and implemented a number of quality improvement programs including a technical assistance program, public reporting measures, recognition programs, training/education efforts, risk management requirements and mandated increases in minimum direct care staffing.
All of these measures stem from legislative mandates implemented in direct response to concerns regarding the quality of care in Florida nursing homes and the liability insurance crisis.
The centerpiece of the quality improvement efforts is the Quality Monitor program first established in 1999.
The monitors visit all facilities quarterly, providing education and monitoring for facility staff.
They also seek to identify any conditions that are potentially detrimental to the health, safety, and welfare of nursing home residents.
The role of the quality monitor has recently expanded to include providing support to field office staff during a closure or immediate jeopardy situation, reviewing the risk management program and records of adverse incidents, and ensuring that staffing requirements are being met.
The majority of participants stated that they found the QM visits to be very helpful, describing them as providing objective, non-threatening advice.
They particularly appreciated the Quality Monitors sharing information on best practices, recommending educational materials and offering interpretation and clarification of state and Federal rules and regulations.
However, many were concerned about the increased blurring of monitor and surveyor roles and the negative impact this could potentially have on the willingness of facilities to openly discuss problems they were experiencing.
The risk management program implemented in 2001 is designed to identify incidents occurring in health care facilities, which have an outcome of patient injury and may reflect error in the course of the delivery of health care services.
Providers reported that the risk management requirement had improved the quality of care by requiring them to investigate incidents and accidents in greater detail, examine their facility processes for flawed practices, and make changes with the goal to prevent future problems.
Although the number of liability claims filed in the state has reportedly been tapering off since it peaked in October 2001, there has not yet been an easing in the liability insurance crisis.
Consumer advocates and provider representatives we spoke with had mixed reviews of the quality improvement programs.
While nearly all stakeholders would recommend the Quality Monitor and risk management programs, not all believed strongly in the ability of any of the implemented programs to improve quality of care or resident outcomes.
In fact, many stakeholders were skeptical that these efforts were sufficient to solve the quality of care problem in nursing homes.
They named issues such as the pervasive problem of high staff turnover and inadequate reimbursement as barriers to high quality performance.
We are unable to draw conclusions as to what effect any of Florida's quality improvement programs will have on nursing home quality.
First, the programs have been in operation for only a short period of time.
Second, the state is not performing the type of evaluation necessary for a rigorous impact analysis.
Furthermore, there are a multitude of initiatives underway, all enacted during the same timeframe and during a time of changes within the nursing home industry (e.g., declines in occupancy, Medicare skilled nursing facility prospective payment, public reporting of MDS-based quality indicators).
Even so, by reviewing the experiences of Florida, we believe some important lessons can be learned that might be applicable to other states considering quality improvement programs.
In addition to those described in the Lessons Learned section above, we would add that states planning to implement quality improvement programs should consider the potential need to evaluate these programs--which is being demanded increasingly by program funders in the current fiscal environment--and do their best to design the programs in a manner that will allow their evaluation needs to be met.
IOWA
Overview of the Iowa Site Visit
This report describes our exploration of the various quality improvement programs initiated by the State of Iowa.
It begins with background information on the programs and how the visit and discussions were structured and continues with a brief history and rationale for how the various quality improvement programs were selected and implemented.
A description of the programs follows along with the research team's findings (from discussions with state employees and nursing facility providers) regarding the overall strengths and weaknesses of the programs as well as a discussion on the impact that these programs have had on the quality of life and quality of care of Iowa nursing home residents.
It concludes with lessons learned by the state, the sustainability of the various programs and the participants' opinions on the role of the Federal Government in quality improvement in nursing facilities.
Background
Although it does not have a technical assistance program, Iowa has a large number of innovative programs intended to improve nursing home quality.
Despite the absence of a technical assistance program, the project's Technical Advisory Group believed that the study should include Iowa, as its programs may be substitutes for a technical assistance program and may include quality improvement models that other states may wish to replicate, potentially improving our study's ability to provide guidance to states considering implementing quality improvement projects.
Iowa's quality improvement programs involve a wide variety of efforts including an Internet web-based Nursing Home Report Card, recognition programs for innovative practices and outstanding performance on licensure and certification surveys, training for providers and surveyors, feedback on surveys/surveyors and an alternative survey process for state-only licensed facilities meeting certain criteria.
Participants
Abt staff members Alan White and Donna Hurd met with individuals involved in the development, management and implementation of Iowa's programs, as well as representatives from two of the state's provider groups, the State's Long Term Care Ombudsmen, and others familiar with the state's programs.
Over a three-day visit in June 2002, the research team met with individuals and groups associated with the following organizations: * Iowa Department of Inspections and Appeals (DIA), Health Facilities Division (HFD) + Marvin Tooman, Ed.D., HFD Administrator + J Bennett, Kathy Sutton, Paul Vanderburgh, Medicaid/Medicare Bureau Chiefs + Larry Lindblom, Bureau Chief and DIA web page authority + Karen Zaabel and Carol Benskin, Division Trainers + Dean Lerner, Deputy Director of DIA
* The Iowa Association of Homes and Services for the Aging (IAHSA) + Dana Petrowsky
* The Iowa Foundation for Medical Care (Partners group and Iowa QIO) + Andi Dykstra, Director of NH/HH Partnerships + Linda Sims, Manager, Medicaid Quality Improvement
* The Iowa Health Care Association (IHCA) + Steve Ackerson, Executive Director + Liz Williams-Chafin, Director of Staffing and Regulatory Services
* Long-Term Care Ombudsman + Jeanne Yordi + Corey Stull RN
* Sunny Crest Nursing Home (a facility that practices resident centered care) + Darlene Millard, Administrator
Marvin Tooman, Ed.D., the HFD Administrator, was the primary contact for the Iowa site visit.
He has been in this position for about two years and previously was a facility administrator (at On With Life, a non-profit post-acute rehabilitation facility that specializes in brain injury/neurological and pulmonary rehabilitation).
Dr. Tooman leads the division responsible for many of the state's quality initiatives.
The division has made an effort to recognize facilities doing exemplary work, to improve relations between providers and surveyors (i.e., through the joint surveyor-provider training), and to encourage facilities to engage in resident-centered care.
Dr. Tooman was an excellent resource for us, and the work of him and his staff in helping to plan our visit is greatly appreciated.
We found that everyone with whom we spoke were willing to speak freely on their impressions of the State's programs, and found a great deal of consistency in their responses.
Preparation
Prior to the on-site visit, factual information on the quality improvement programs was gathered based on our discussions with Dr. Tooman, stakeholder discussions, DIA's web site, and Insight, the department's quarterly newsletter for nursing facilities.
Insight was a particularly valuable resource-- it had information on most of the state's quality improvement programs that gave the site visit team valuable background information.
Information on the following aspects of the programs was gathered and organized in a table: * Program title including a regulatory reference, if applicable; * Program description; * Agency contact--the person(s) most knowledgeable about the program protocols and implementation to date; * Impetus--what prompted the development of the program; * Designer--identify the individual(s) or group(s) responsible for program design and indicate agency affiliation(s); * Goals--state the program objectives; * Funding Source and Amount--state current funding amounts/sources and projections for future periods; * Program Staff--indicate how many individuals are involved in the program implementation including administrative support, what is the organizational structure; * Facility Involvement--is this a requirement for all facilities or a voluntary program, how are facilities selected for inclusion, if voluntary? * Dates--what are the program beginning and end dates; * Evaluation--indicate current and planned formal evaluation program(s).
The table was forwarded to Marvin Tooman, prior to the on-site visit.
He reviewed the table and added some additional details.
The research team used the factual information in the table as a starting point to develop discussion questions that focused on more in-depth issues.
Structure
Discussions with everyone but the IAHSA representative took place at their office.
(For logistical reasons, we met with the IAHSA representative at DIA's offices.)
Meetings lasted from one to two hours.
A Brief Description of Iowa's Nursing Home Industry
In order to put Iowa in context with the other study states, we have included some descriptive characteristics of the State's nursing home environment.
Comparative data presented are from the American Health Care Association (AHCA) web site (AHCA, 2002).
There are 470 facilities in Iowa, with 29,535 residents reported as of Spring 2001.
The average number of beds per facility is 96, which is slightly lower than the national average of 108.
Iowa's median occupancy rate per facility is 84 percent as compared to the national rate of 95 percent.
The percentage of for-profit homes is lower than the national average, (52 percent vs. 65 percent) while the percentage of not-for-profit homes is higher (43 percent vs. 28 percent nationally) with few government-operated facilities (4.7 percent vs. 6.5 percent).
Fewer of Iowa's facilities are hospital-based (11 percent vs. 12 percent nationally) and dually certified for Medicare and Medicaid (60 percent vs. 80 percent nationally).
Impetus for Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs
No single event or series of events or situations within Iowa or outside the state were reported by participants as being the impetus for the Iowa quality improvement programs.
The development of the programs appears to stem from the vision of several key contributors.
First, Iowa Governor Tom Vilsack has long been a vocal supporter of nursing home issues, both as governor and while serving in the Iowa Senate.
The appointment of Marvin Tooman, a former nursing facility provider, to the position of administrator of the Health Facilities Division greatly aided in promoting the issue of quality.
The current programs are the result of a uniform vision within the restraints of the current state budget crisis.
The first quality improvement program, the nursing home report card, was initially the idea of bureau chief, Larry Lindblom back in 1996 or 1997.
It started as a web page to provide information to the public, news, and links to CMS (formerly HCFA).
He later thought that it could be improved by adding survey results.
At the time the Report Card section of the web site was developed, only one other state (Arizona) had done any work in this area and the Federal Government's site was still under development.
In 1999, during his first year in office, Governor Vilsack included among his legislative proposals the creation of the Governor's Award for Quality Care in Health Care Facilities.
The selection of Marvin Tooman in February 2000, as HFD administrator made him, reportedly, the first person outside the Department of Inspections and Appeals to hold that position.
His background and education make him uniquely qualified for the position.
Prior to his appointment, Tooman had been CEO and president of his own company, "On With Life," a non-profit post acute care program specializing in brain injury/neurological and pulmonary rehabilitation.
Prior to starting "On With Life," Tooman spent 11 years as a resource manager for the Iowa Department of Education's Division of Vocational Rehabilitation.
He holds a Bachelor's degree in Education, a Master's Degree in Counseling, and a Doctorate in Administration and he is an Adjunct Assistant Professor in the University of Iowa's College of Education.
He received his quality improvement training in the military, having been trained on the Baldrige self-assessment process.
He is also a Commission on Accreditation for Rehabilitation Facilities (CARF) surveyor.
Toomam explained that CARF standards are very similar to the Baldrige criteria.
At the time of our interviews, he was the president-elect of the Association of Health Facility Survey Agencies.
In the first nine months following his selection, the department introduced the Quality-Based inspections program in May 2000, the Joint Surveyor/Provider Training in June 2000; the Deficiency-Free certificates in October 2000 and Best Practices program in November 2000.
Later in June 2001, the survey questionnaire was introduced.
Overall Intent/Vision for Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs
The goal of quality improvement programs is viewed as promoting the "culture of quality."
Tooman has expressed the department's vision for nursing home quality by writing regularly in DIA's quarterly newsletter, Insight.
In the June 2001 issue, Tooman wrote about the department changing the HFD mission statement.
He wrote:
"Assuredly, within this experience, we are accountable to the state and federal rules that provide a "baseline" for the quality of care that our residents and clients receive.
However, we should not be satisfied with merely maintaining the minimum standard of state and federal rules.
To that extent the HFD has changed it's mission statement.--"The mission of the HFD is to promote the quality and optimal outcomes of services through a survey process that centers on enhancing the lives of the people served."
Tooman puts the responsibility for success on the facilities that are able to introduce and maintain a "culture" of quality care.
He went on to state that, "we need to insure compliance with state and federal rules.
But rule compliance is a by-product of a quality improvement effort.
...First, it is safe to say that the facility is not immune from the problems that nursing homes face on a daily basis.
And there may be occasions where they may be deficient with a rule or two. ...[T]hey have established a way of operation that speaks to quality services.
Some may say that they have a "Quality Culture."
Bureau chiefs echoed Tooman's belief in a quality culture, noting that they recognize quality through mechanisms presented in the Baldrige criteria and that they had moved in that direction via a culture change.
They explained that they saw themselves as a team "all pointing in the same direction" and that changes had been "strategized and well implemented."
Description of Quality Improvement Programs in Iowa
This section includes a brief description of each of Iowa's quality improvement programs followed by a discussion of program funding, governance and the management and staffing structure.
The following quality improvement programs were reviewed: * Nursing Home Report Card * Quality-Based Inspections of State-Licensed Facilities * Surveyor/Provider Training * Best Practices * Governor's Award for Quality Care * Deficiency Free Certificates of Recognition * Survey Questionnaire
Nursing Home Report Card
The Nursing Home Report Card is an Internet web site that contains information on all federally certified nursing facilities and skilled nursing facilities in the state.
The Report Card allows users to search for facilities by name or location.
It includes "quality indicators" (Note: These are F-tags and not the CMS quality indicators) based on survey results.
The web site includes the full inspection report, including detailed write-ups of deficiencies and the facility responses/Plans of Correction.
All survey/complaint investigations since June 1999 are listed, including those under appeal, with the appeal noted (see Appendix C for a sample facility Report Card).
The Report Card also includes information on facility best practices.
The legislation that created the Report Cards was passed in late 1997.
At that point in time, the CMS Nursing Home Compare site was still under development, and there was little consumer information on nursing homes available on the Internet.
The Iowa Nursing Home Report Card went on-line on November 5, 1999.
A goal of the Report Card is to provide consumers with information on nursing home quality so that they can make informed nursing home choices.
It is believed that provision of this information will motivate facilities to improve quality.
The department strongly believes in making information available to consumers, believing, according to Dr. Tooman, that the availability of public information is "sacrosanct" (except when it is necessary to protect confidentiality).
Iowa is the only state that researchers are aware of that posts complete survey results on the Internet.
The survey findings are posted to the Report Card web site two days after the survey is mailed to the facility.
According to an article in Insight, the Report Card website was designed over an 18-month period as DIA worked in collaboration with resident advocates and nursing home industry leaders.
DIA met with stakeholders twice as they developed the report card.
The group included representatives from the four provider groups, the Iowa Partners group, advocacy groups, ombudsmen, state legislators, and representatives from the Departments of Elder Affairs and Public Health.
In the facilitated meetings, DIA presented a shell and asked for input from stakeholders.
Quality-Based Inspections
Under the Quality-Based Inspection Program, facilities that are state-only licensed may be surveyed every six to 30 months, depending on facility performance.
The program was intended to allow DIA to maximize its resources and concentrate more fully on the facilities in the state needing the greatest attention.
Legislation authorizing the program was signed on May 11, 2000 (Senate Bill 2144).
The quality based inspection program is reported to have originated from provider groups requesting the state to make changes in the survey process.
Facilities opting to participate must complete a detailed application process based on the Malcolm Baldrige National Quality Program.
The Baldrige Award is given by the President of the United States to businesses and education and health care organizations that apply and are judged to be outstanding in seven areas: leadership, strategic planning, customer and market focus, information and analysis, human resource focus, process management, and business results.
Nationwide, there were five winners in 2001.
DIA modified the Baldrige application process by shortening the application and broadening the categories to accommodate the limited resources of most nursing facilities.
The program, however, has not been truly successful.
Very few facilities have opted to participate.
There are ten nursing facilities statewide that do not participate in the Medicare or Medicaid programs, and are thus eligible for the program.
Three facilities were invited to participate in a pilot program, but only one nursing facility has completed the self-assessment necessary to participate in the quality-based inspections program.
Furthermore, the potential benefits from participating (in terms of a less frequent survey cycle) are probably outweighed by the time and effort required to apply.
A major component of the Baldrige National Quality Program is the feedback report, which is a written assessment of an organization's strengths and opportunities for improvement based on its application.
Due largely to limited staff availability and budgetary restrictions, the Iowa-modified program does not provide any type of feedback report to its applicants.
This feedback report had been envisioned as one way, among others, that the department could provide a type of technical assistance to facilities.
Best Practices
Begun in November 2000, the Best Practices Program aims to recognize and disseminate new and innovative approaches to providing nursing home care.
Shortly after assuming the Division Administrator duties, Dr. Tooman observed a surveyor congratulating a director of nursing on a uniquely successful nursing procedure.
He believed that the details on this practice should be shared with other facilities and that at the time there were no means to accomplish that.
The goal for the program as described by DIA is to close the gap between knowledge and practice and point to positive approaches to integrating new knowledge and practices.
Facilities that believe they have developed an innovative practice report it to the surveyor during the annual inspection.
The surveyors review the practice on site with the team leader, making the decision as to whether it qualifies as a Best Practice.
Those practices deemed to be among the best in the state are recognized and posted on the division's Report Cards and in a separate listing on the web site.
Best Practices are sought and recognized in nine categories--community integration, dietary, resident rights, nursing practices, human resource management, environmental, quality of life, habilitation/rehabilitation and end-of-life experiences.
Currently, there are 300 Best Practices listed on the web site (note that fewer than 300 facilities are represented since some facilities are recognized for more than one best practice.)
Originally, the department's web site denoted best practices with a trophy icon, but this was later changed to a light bulb, as the department wanted to emphasize that the Best Practice program was designed to recognize a facility's practice, not the facility itself.
Also, the practice of sending facilities Certificates of Recognition was later changed to the sending of a letter, because of confusion related to certain facilities receiving recognition and then later having problems with survey inspections and/or complaints.
Appendix D includes the state's principles and procedures of Best Practices.
Joint Surveyor Provider Training
Beginning in June 2000, the DIA and the provider associations have collaborated to present four joint surveyor/provider training sessions, with another session scheduled in October 2002.
Training sessions have been held on elopement, activity-focused care, dental needs of long term care residents and resident-centered living.
The October 2002 session will address pain-related issues.
The department initiated the joint training sessions in an effort to provide a common knowledge base for surveyors and providers and to enhance the quality of care and quality of life of the state's residents.
The department utilizes local community colleges to assist with the organization of the training with experts in the topic recruited to conduct the actual training sessions.
For example, two professors from the University of Iowa College of Dentistry led the training sessions on oral health and Eric Haider, from the Crestview Nursing Home in Bethany, Missouri spoke about his philosophy on resident-centered care.
Nearly all of the state's 60 surveyors and 200- 350 providers have participated.
Governor's Quality Awards
The Governor's Award for Quality Care in Health Care Facilities recognizes quality services provided by long term care facilities, residential care facilities and intermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded or mentally ill.
The award is based on the uniqueness of the services provided by the facilities to its residents, and any activities undertaken by the facility to enhance the quality of care or quality of life for its residents.
The program was signed into law on May 11, 2000 with the first awards given in 2001 to eight health care facilities.
Nominations may be made by residents, family members, advocates and staff at other nursing homes.
A stakeholder committee selected by the Director of the Department of Inspections and Appeals reviews nominations.
Committee members evaluate each nomination and recommend facilities for further consideration.
Prior to the selection of finalists, onsite reviews are made by DIA personnel to verify the accuracy of the information in the nomination.
There can be up to two winners in each of the state's five Congressional districts.
In 2001, there were 29 nominations and five winners.
In the first year of the program, the awards were mailed to seven of the award-winning facilities, with the Governor making a personal presentation at one location.
This past year, Governor Vilsack presented the awards at the Governor's Annual Conference on Aging.
Deficiency-Free Certificates of Recognition
Beginning in September 2000, DIA provides certificates of recognition to facilities that are deficiency-free in their annual inspection.
The certificate is the department's way of acknowledging the "hard work and dedication" of the facility's staff in meeting the established standards of care.
During the fiscal year that ended in September 2000, nearly 15 percent of the state's 800 long-term care, intermediate and residential care facilities had achieved deficiency free surveys.
In March 2001, it was reported that 55 nursing facilities had received certificates.
Survey Questionnaire
Since June 2001, facilities have had the opportunity to complete a survey questionnaire that is presented at the conclusion of the regular survey.
Completed surveys are returned to the Iowa Foundation for Medical Care (IFMC) for tabulation.
IFMC estimates that 40-50 surveys are returned each month.
The goal of the questionnaire is to improve the survey process in the state, ultimately improving the provision of health care services in the state.
The survey includes information on surveyor conduct; facility opportunity to provide information and survey-related data; clarity of exit conference information; and whether the facility received information on the Best Practices program.
Providers are also given the opportunity to provide general comments on the survey process, including suggestions on how to improve it.
IFMC produces a report for DIA in an Excel spreadsheet, which DIA in turn shares with their staff.
In May 2002, the state average was 4.62 (on a one to five scale with five representing the most favorable rating).
Data are stratified for each program coordinator so that specific areas for improvement can be identified and addressed.
Program Funding
The Nursing Home Report Card, Best Practices Program, Joint Surveyor/Provider Training, Deficiency-Free Certificates and Survey Questionnaires are funded through a combination of federal and state dollars, with 73 percent of budgeted costs paid by federal funds.
Only the costs for the Governor's Award for Quality Care ($5,000) and the Quality-Based Inspections ($7,000) are funded entirely through state funds.
Current annual programming costs for the Nursing Home Report Cards are approximately $25,000 per year, with 73 percent paid by federal funds.
In the 2002 budget, costs related to the division's web site were about $105,000, which included $31,500 for web maintenance, $10,800 for web hosting, $41,000 for electronic licensing, and $21,000 for scheduling software.
The Best Practices program costs an estimated $15,000 per year, 73 percent of which is paid by the Federal Government.
The cost associated with the Joint Surveyor/Provider Training sessions is approximately $50,000 per year, with 73 percent (approximately $36,500) paid by federal funds.
The Deficiency-Free Certificates ($500 per year), and the Survey Questionnaire ($50,000 per year) each receive 73 percent of program costs from the Federal Government.
Governance of Programs
Each of the quality improvement programs is administered through the Iowa Department of Inspections and Appeals' Health Facilities Division.
Management and Staffing
Staff within the Department of Inspections and Appeals, Health Facilities Division, is involved in the management as well as the day-to-day operation of the various quality improvement programs.
One Bureau Chief is responsible for routing of any questions (2-6 questions per day) that come through the web site to the appropriate person for a response.
A clerical person scans the survey reports so that they can be posted to the web after the reports have been reviewed for removal of any confidential information.
Although participation in the Quality Based Inspections Program is very low, DIA staff is responsible for reviewing applications and determining the appropriate frequency of surveys based on facility applications.
Joint Surveyor/Provider training is coordinated by two DIA trainers who are responsible for the planning, organization and recruitment of experts to conduct the sessions.
Potential Best Practices are verified by the survey team leader during the survey process.
Once verified, the HFD administrator and other staff further consider the identified practice.
A stakeholder committee, chosen annually by the department Director, reviews the Governor's Award nominations.
The Deficiency-Free Certificate program does not require any additional staff, as it is handled as part of the normal survey process.
The state's QIO (the Iowa Foundation for Medical Care) handles data entry of responses on the Survey Questionnaires.
No analysis of the data is generated.
However, a summary report is forwarded to the department on a regular basis.
Aspects of Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs that Work Well
Provider representatives overwhelmingly agreed that recognition programs (Deficiency Free Certificates, Governor's Quality Award, and Best Practices) did much to boost nursing facilities' morale.
Over and over, participants stated that in the heavily regulated and scrutinized nursing home environment, facilities were grateful for positive recognition.
Stakeholders told us that receipt of such awards was sometimes publicized in community newspapers and local media.
Both provider associations agreed that the Best Practices program was a good informational resource for facilities as well as providing recognition for exemplary programs.
The Nursing Home Report Card was generally recognized as reporting current, accurate information, although there is considerable controversy regarding the posting of survey results that are under appeal (see further discussion below).
Bureau chiefs reported that it had cut down on telephone requests for survey information and had saved considerable staff time sending out paper copies of survey results.
Bureau chiefs and the Ombudsman agreed that the report card had done a good job improving consumer access to public information.
According to division web site statistics, the web site is widely used with 14,664 sessions recorded in June 2002 (this does not represent unique users since some individuals may have accessed the web site multiple times).
The Report Card pages are among the most accessed on the division's web site, with 7,050 hits to the report card result summaries, 5,945 hits on the detailed facility results, almost 5,000 hits to the report card search page and 2,292 viewings of the detailed survey findings.
Although it is not possible to determine the identity of web site users, they do represent nearly every state, as well as Europe and Asia.
According to one of the Bureau Chiefs, report card utilization had gone up 50 percent in the last six months.
In September 2000, GovNetworks and eGovernment magazine recognized the division web site with their Digital Award of Excellence, which is intended for deserving web sites that benefit the public.
Joint Surveyor/Provider trainings have been well attended--600 attended the first programs (elopement prevention), 200 attended the programs on creative care giving, 300 attended the oral health training, and 300 participated in the programs on resident centered care.
Joint trainings may have helped improve relations between facilities and surveyors.
Based on feedback forms, providers find these sessions very informative and useful.
The Survey Questionnaire reportedly has increased surveyor accountability, and has encouraged them to be more courteous, communicative, professional and approachable.
Provider associations were pleased to have had input in the development of the questionnaire.
Aspects of Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to be Less Successful
Although there was agreement that nursing facilities appreciated recognition for good performance, there was concern expressed by the Ombudsman that these awards gave consumers a false sense of security.
In their experience, they noted that consumers seeing a Best Practice icon on the website or a Deficiency Free Certificate assumed that the facility was performing well in all care areas on a consistent basis.
In fact, as they pointed out, a Deficiency Free Certificate only attested to the facilities' ability to meet minimal standards for the days that the surveyors were in the building.
Likewise, recognition of one good area of practice did not mean that all practice areas were exemplary.
HFD surveyor trainers noted that advocacy groups had been critical that these award programs were seen as bringing the regulatory agency too close to the entity they were supposed to be regulating.
The Ombudsman also noted that the requirement that the Best Practice be reported and evaluated during the survey was burdensome for facilities.
They recommended that the recognition of Best Practices not be tied to a particular facility, but listed separately on the website.
One of the most difficult situations for all parties to contend with concerned those facilities that had received recognition for a practice or deficiency free survey and then later had compliance problems.
These situations had been widely reported in the news media by an individual reporter who focused on long-term care issues.
Initial praise and recognition of a facility that subsequently falls into disfavor was reported by participants as making the whole process look suspect.
Another very controversial issue concerned the posting of all deficiencies on the web site, including those that were under appeal.
The HFD policy is to post them two days after they are mailed to facilities and if appealed by the facility to mark them as such on the website.
Both provider associations had unsuccessfully attempted to block the posting of deficiencies under appeal.
Provider associations stated that even when deficiencies were later overturned, the damage from the initial posting and subsequent publication in the media was not readily reversed.
Appealed postings are noted as pending appeal.
The third most widely expressed concern with the Nursing Home Report Card posting of deficiencies is that it is claimed by some industry representatives to have had an impact on nursing home liability insurance rates.
According to the AHCA representative, based on the number of deficiencies, some insurance companies were not writing policies and others had increased rates to the point that they were unaffordable by facilities.
According to the department's Deputy Director, the governor convened a task force to examine insurance issues generally.
The Task Force report does not note any connection between rates/availability of insurance and the web site report card postings.
Other more minor issues with the Nursing Home Report Card concerned the ease of consumer use.
The Ombudsman pointed out that consumers were confused by the listing of complaints that were found unsubstantiated.
Complaints that are not substantiated are not written out in their entirety.
They recommended that all complaints be posted so that trends over time could be evaluated.
The provider associations also felt that more collateral materials should be included on the website to aide consumer understanding of the information posted.
They also disagreed with the inclusion of the names of directors of nursing and administrators in several years worth of data, noting that if these individuals are no longer employed because of poor performance their information remains on the web site.
Participants were mixed in their impressions as to how widely the Report Card was used by consumers.
Consumer advocates noted that many consumers do not know that it is out there and that especially in many rural situations, there may only be one facility within a reasonable distance of family members and in this situation there could be little benefit to using the report card for facility selection.
There was widespread agreement from all participants that the Quality-Based Inspections program had not been successful as the application process was generally too burdensome for the majority of facilities to complete.
Only ten nursing facilities are state-only licensed and even though the program had been modified in an attempt to streamline the process, only one had applied to participate in the program.
Additionally, the benefits from applying for the quality-based inspections were reported as, "not worth the effort."
The potential benefit is that the survey cycle could be extended to as long as 30 months.
And, even for facilities that qualify for an extended survey cycle, some type of annual follow-up (a validation review) is required to make sure that the facility is still performing at the high level required to justify the longer survey cycle.
The validation review involves one or two surveyors on site for no more than two days and involves a quality assessment based on the program's criteria.
The State's Ombudsman reported that the philosophy of the quality-based inspection program "scared them."
They believed that there could be large changes in provider quality after the inspection (i.e., in the case of "yo-yo compliance") and are opposed to any program that would increase the length of time between inspections.
Provider representatives reported that facilities were not convinced that responses on the survey questionnaire were completely anonymous.
Even though the forms are sent to the Iowa Foundation for Medical Care for tabulation, providers are fearful that surveyors have access to the survey feedback information.
Provider associations reported that comments they received from facilities regarding surveys were not consistent with the survey results that they had received from HFD.
Either facilities were not completing the survey or were being overly generous to HFD in their rankings.
The provider association also believed that individual surveyors should be named on the questionnaire rather than be reported at the coordinator/supervisor level.
In their opinion, the naming of individual surveyors would lead to individual employment counseling where indicated.
IHCA has developed and begun distributing its own questionnaire, which is similar to that used by DIA (except that it includes surveyor-specific questions) so that the association may compare its results with those obtained from the department questionnaires.
Joint provider/surveyor training was praised for providing access for both groups to up-to-date clinical information although progress toward its secondary goal of opening up communication between the two groups was seen as marginal.
Participants noted reluctance on the part of both groups to asking questions in the group setting, as providers did not want to share areas of facility weakness and surveyors did not want to look uninformed in front of providers.
Surveyor trainers also noted that by providing these joint training sessions, they necessarily had to cut back on the number of surveyor-only meetings for budgetary reasons.
Also, provider associations initially objected to the issuing of continuing education units for these programs, as the income from offering educational programs has traditionally made up a major part of their revenue.
Impact of Iowa's Quality Improvement Programs on Quality of Care/Quality of Life
No evaluation of the impact of these programs has been made to date.
Some decrease in the number of deficiencies has been noted in recent years, but it is not clear that there is any connection between the quality improvement programs and the number of deficiencies cited.
Although there are statistics available on how many people access the website, there is no information as to whether these users are consumers, policymakers, researchers, or others.
It is not known how the Report Cards affect consumer choices or facility quality.
With only one nursing home in the state having applied to participate in the Quality-Based Inspections program, it is clear that this program, as implemented, has not had any impact on the quality of care or the quality of life for Iowa nursing home residents.
Based on informal polling of providers, Dr. Tooman reported that the majority of providers have at least looked at the best practices, and he has anecdotal evidence that some facilities have adopted the best practices of other facilities.
Ombudsman did not note any significant improvement in care since the implementation of the quality improvement programs.
They explained that, for example, the Governor's Award program, "It's nice and warm and fuzzy, but we don't really know that it improves care."
They went on to say that these programs have focused on the average and above average facilities and have not raised the standards or done enough to deal with the poor performers.
They believe that many of the best practices just represent activities that the facility should be performing routinely and do not represent exceptional care.
They also believe that many facilities do not nominate themselves for a Best Practice Award believing that these practices are simply, "part of their job."
One provider representative stated that, "nothing improves quality more than reimbursement."
She went on to say that although award programs are going in the right direction--the number one and two issues for facilities are reimbursement and consultative assistance and that these are the issues that facilities would like addressed--the "rest of this is just window dressing."
Sustainability and Lessons Learned
Except for the Quality-Based Inspections program, discussion participants did not identify any programs noted as unsuccessful or at risk of discontinuation.
The department places great importance on making information available to consumers.
There were no plans to add additional items (e.g., staffing information or MDS quality indicators) to the Nursing Home Report Cards.
When CMS begins posting the quality indicators, the department will include a link to this site.
AHCA representatives advised other states to carefully consider all aspects of a report card and to have as much detail on the description, development and implementation as possible written into the legislation.
They advised other states to consider what information will be seen by the public, how it will be displayed, timeframes for display, and how much collaboration there will be in the development process as examples of the types of topics that should be clearly defined prior to enactment.
They noted that when the legislation to develop the Iowa report card was passed, it sounded acceptable, but later they found that DIA's interpretation of the legislation varied significantly from their interpretation, which led to the current problems regarding the posting of deficiencies prior to the resolution of appeals.
Ombudsmen stated that they would like to see all complaints posted, including those that are not substantiated.
They also advised that more advertising is needed to let consumers know that the report card is available.
There was general agreement that the application for the Quality-Based Inspections program needs to be simplified and the benefits for eligible facilities enhanced.
Until CMS is willing to consider an alternative survey process which differentiates between good and poor performers, programs designed to make it possible for good facilities to be surveyed less often will not work if they can only be applied to state-licensed only nursing homes, given that most homes participate in Medicaid and/or Medicare.
Participants believed that programs rewarding best practices and deficiency-free surveys were valuable, despite the potential fall-out if those facilities later run into problems.
They pointed out that it was important to have an objective process by which facilities are judged, so that the award is seen as truly recognizing outstanding quality and not based on other factors such as politics.
Both provider groups and the department indicated that they were pleased with the joint training programs and would recommend these to other states.
High attendance at the sessions is indicative of the value that providers place on the training.
DIA trainers suggest that states collaborate with community colleges and universities in the development of curriculum and presentation of materials.
They also suggested that since provider associations usually have had more experience in planning and presenting educational programs, the states use them as resources.
States should also consult with provider associations so as not to duplicate topics.
DIA trainers also noted that states should avoid controversial topics, such as regulatory issues, and select "safer" topics, such as clinical issues.
The survey questionnaire was reported to be a relatively inexpensive way of improving the survey process, increasing surveyor accountability, and allowing facilities to provide feedback to the department.
DIA recommends it to other states interested in these outcomes.
Role of Federal Government in Quality Improvement
Dr. Tooman explained that he prefers that the Federal Government take the lead on providing "technical advisement" to states and facilities on quality-based cultures and organizational processes.
Although the Quality-Based Inspections program, based on the Baldrige criteria was less than successful in Iowa because of its complexity and the limited resources available to most nursing homes, he remains a strong proponent of the process, having been a trainer prior to joining HFD.
He believes that through technical assistance, facilities can be "equipped to do a better job.
Summary and Conclusions
Budgetary issues emerged as having a significant impact on the department's current programs and plans for future quality improvement programs.
Iowa had experienced a 4.6 percent cut in last year's budget, plus additional cuts that amount to about 4.6 percent for this year.
Despite the Governor's support for long-term care issues (he introduced a bill that would have allowed the state to shift resources so that budget cuts would not need to be as large) the general assembly rejected this proposal.
Due to the budget cuts and expanded responsibilities (DIA recently assumed the responsibility for regulating assisted living programs), the concern for DIA has been to maintain current QI programs, as it is currently not feasible to implement new programs.
Provider group representatives expressed their desire for a consultative component to the survey process.
They appreciate the recognition programs and awards, but identify the lack of "someone they could call for help," as a problem.
Other than higher reimbursement, some type of technical assistance is what facilities want most from the state.
Dr. Tooman noted that he has interest in implementing a technical assistance program, but the lack of available state funding in combination with additional DIA responsibilities make such an undertaking not feasible at this time.
Funding remains a difficult issue.
Another significant influence on quality improvement programs in Iowa comes from the media.
The State's major newspaper, the Des Moines Register, has focused a great deal of attention on long-term care issues, raising public awareness of quality in nursing homes and assisted living programs.
The Nursing Home Report Cards are a major source of information for these articles and attention has been given to homes that receive awards, but are later cited for major deficiencies.
During the site visit, the Register began a major series on assisted living programs.
The attention generated from previous articles on these programs reportedly led to the change in oversight responsibility from the Department of Elder Affairs to DIA.
Finally, Dr. Tooman's background as a former facility chief executive officer and administrator and his sensitivity to facility issues appear to have contributed to the direction that DIA has taken in developing and implementing its quality improvement programs.
DIA has made an effort to recognize facilities doing exemplary work, to improve relations between providers and surveyors, and to encourage facilities to engage in continuous quality improvement.
References
AHCA.
State Summaries of Nursing Facilities, 2001/www.ahca.org/research/keynotes/statefactsheets-2001.pdf.
Iowa Department of Inspections and Appeals.
Governor Unveils Nursing Home Report Card Site.
Insight, February 2000.
Tooman, M.L., Department, Health Care Providers Share Common Responsibilities.
Iowa Department of Inspections and Appeals.
Insight, June 2001.
Tooman, M.L., Presentation Sparks Motivation for Quality Care.
Iowa Department of Inspections and Appeals.
Insight, September 2001.
MAINE
Overview of the Maine Visit
Maine was selected for a site visit because it met the criteria established by the research team and Technical Advisory Group in that it has established and funded quality improvement programs, which are not reimbursement related.
Researchers were particularly interested in Maine because of the unique technical assistance component within the quality improvement programs.
Maine's technical assistance program, in existence since 1994, consists of one nurse who provides consultation and educational inservices statewide to any long term care facility on problem resident behaviors.
The Technical Advisory Group believed that Maine's small technical assistance program might serve as a model to other states that were interested in providing technical assistance to nursing facilities but not able to implement a large-scale program.
The State also recently enacted legislation that mandated a Best Practices Program, a consumer satisfaction survey and measures to significantly increase their minimum nurse staffing ratios.
Participants
Abt staff members Donna Hurd and Leighna Kim spent one day in Augusta, Maine on September 12, 2002.
The following individuals agreed to participate in in-person and telephone discussions with the researchers: * Division of Licensing and Certification, Bureau of Medical Services + Laura Cote RN, Long Term Care Behavior Management Consultant + Diane Jones RN, Assistant Director
* Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program, Bureau of Adult and Elder Services + Brenda Gallant RN, State Long Term Care Ombudsman + Catherine Valcourt, Legal Counsel
* Maine Health Care Association + Nadine Grasso, Director of Communications
* For-Profit, Multi-Nursing Chain Facility--65 Beds + Assistant Director of Nursing
* For-Profit Partnership, Multi-Facility Chain Facility--62 Beds + Director of Nursing
* For Profit, Independently Owned Facility--60 Beds + Director of Nursing
* State Representative + Thomas J. Kane, Ph.D., Chairman of the Health and Human Services Committee
Laura Cote and Brenda Gallant were the primary contacts for our Maine visit.
Ms. Cote and her supervisor, Diane Jones participated in both in-person and telephone discussions.
Ms. Cote also provided written information about the behavioral consulting program and a list of directors of nursing who would be willing to speak with us about her services.
Ms. Gallant and Ms. Grasso were helpful in providing information on the quality improvement programs enacted as part of the April 2000 omnibus legislation.
Ms. Gallant provided copies of the final legislation.
Dr. Kane provided valuable information on the development of the legislation.
Preparation
Prior to the on-site visit, factual information on the quality improvement program was gathered from a literature review, stakeholder discussions and Maine Department of Human Services web site.
Information on the following aspects of the programs was gathered and organized in a table: * Program title; * Program description; * Agency contact--the person(s) most knowledgeable about the program protocols and implementation to date; * Impetus--what prompted the development of the program; * Designer--identify the individual(s) or group(s) responsible for program design and indicate agency affiliation(s); * Goals--state the program objectives; * Funding Source and Amount--state current funding amounts/sources and projections for future periods; * Program Staff--indicate how many individuals are involved in the program implementation including administrative support, what is the organizational structure; * Facility Involvement--is this a requirement for all facilities or a voluntary program, how are facilities selected for inclusion, if voluntary? * Dates--what are the program beginning and end dates; and * Evaluation--indicate current and planned formal evaluation program(s).
The research team used the factual information in the tables as a starting point to develop discussion questions that focused on more in-depth issues.
Letters of endorsement explaining the project goals, state selection and discussion processes were formulated and sent to prospective participants.
Follow-up phone calls were made to arrange for convenient dates and times for meetings.
Structure
Discussions with Ms. Jones and Ms. Gallant took place at their offices.
Ms. Cote, who works from her home, met with the researchers at the Division of Licensing and Certification offices.
These meetings lasted from one to two hours.
Discussions were generally loosely structured with researchers presenting both prepared and spontaneous questions and recording participants' responses in writing.
Follow-up calls were made with two directors of nursing and one assistant director of nursing of the facilities that Ms. Cote recommended, the Director of Communications at the Maine Health Care Association, and Thomas Kane, the state legislator who chairs the Health and Human Services Committee.
A Brief Description of Maine's Nursing Home Industry
In order to put Maine in context with other study states, we have included some descriptive characteristics of the state's nursing home environment.
Comparative data presented are from the American Health Care Association (AHCA) website (AHCA, 2002).
There are 126 facilities in Maine, with 7,309 residents reported as of Spring 2001.
The average number of beds per facility is 65, which is lower than the national average of 108.
Maine's median occupancy rate per facility is 91 percent as compared to the national rate of 87 percent.
The percentage of for-profit homes is higher than the national average, (71 percent vs. 65 percent) while the percentage of not-for-profit homes is lower (25 percent vs. 28 percent nationally) with few government-operated facilities (4 percent vs. 6.5 percent).
Fewer of Maine's facilities are hospital-based (9.5 percent vs. 12 percent nationally), but there is a higher percent of facilities that are dually certified for Medicare and Medicaid in Maine (100 percent vs. 80 percent nationally).
The state has seen a dramatic shift in the composition of its nursing home population in the past nine years, most likely as a response to the state's case mix reimbursement system and other long-term care reform (e.g., requiring facilities to increase their participation in Medicare by certifying more beds) that were implemented beginning in 1994.^5 * Medicaid census declined 18 percent from 1995-2002.
* Medicaid length of stay declined approximately 44 percent between 1994 and 2002.
* Medicare days doubled during this period, and now represent approximately 11.4 percent of all resident days in nursing facilities.
* Total days of care declined nearly 26 percent.
* The number of licensed beds decreased from 10,207 to 7,708 between 1994 and 2002.
This was primarily the result of converting excess space in nursing homes to residential care, and by closing outdated, antiquated or unnecessary facilities.
Impetus for Maine's Quality Improvement Programs
Behavioral Consultation
The technical assistance component of Maine's quality improvement programs began in 1994, prompted by the closure of a nursing facility whose population was made up primarily of residents with major psychiatric diagnoses and problem behaviors.
The 50-bed facility had accepted residents that other facilities would not admit and experienced significant resident-to-resident and resident-to-staff abuse.
When the decision was made that the facility would close because of state and federal regulatory violations, a transition team was assembled.
Laura Cote, who had been the psychiatric liaison at the facility as well as the resident care coordinator and the staff development coordinator, was recruited as a member of the transition team.
Ms. Cote followed the residents as they were evaluated and placed at new facilities between February and June 1994.
She worked closely with the accepting facilities (40 in Maine and 1 in Massachusetts) to teach staff about each resident and his/her behavioral issues, assist them in understanding the issues, and to develop a care plan.
At the end of the transition period, the Director of the Bureau of Medical Services asked if Ms. Cote would expand her work to provide consultative assistance on problem behaviors to all long term care facilities in the state.
Working first as a consultant and then as a state employee within the Licensing and Certification Department, she continues to provide both consultative services and inservice programs for all long-term facilities in Maine.
Cote explained that while participating in the closure of the facility, she recognized that educational programs available to long term care staff were generally held outside the facility, requiring that a representative of the facility attend the program and carry the information back to the staff.
She envisioned a program that would more effectively provide educational and support services in the environment of the residents and the direct care staff.
She aimed to equally divide her efforts between educational training and consultation.
Consultation is primarily directed at assisting staff to understand and manage resident behavior, rather than counseling or treating residents.
Best Practices, Consumer Satisfaction and Minimum Nurse Staffing Ratios
The Best Practices program, the study on consumer satisfaction and the Minimum Nurse Staffing Ratios were all included in the Omnibus Legislation (LD 42) signed into law (PL 49, chapter 731, part BBBB) on 4/25/00.
This legislation was constructed based on input from stakeholders on what they felt were the most pressing issues in long-term care.
One respondent believed that the impetus for the legislation came out of the climate of the 1990s when there was lack of communication and an atmosphere of distrust between providers and the Department of Human Services.
At the same time there had been significant shifting of resources out of the long-term care system and a tightening of admission criteria.
Also contributing to the legislation was work done by the Joint Standing Committee on Health and Human Services.
Meeting during the fall and winter of 1999-2000, their goal was to develop a framework for how the long-term care system should operate.
They met to examine the issues of long term care delivery systems and the availability and financing of long term care services and to identify fundamental principles that would guide current and future legislation on long-term care.
They recognized that key areas for focus included: a commitment to quality, empowerment of consumers, partnership between providers and the regulators, accountability on the part of providers and the responsibility of the state to provide oversight and technical assistance.
Facilitated by a senior policy analyst from the Muskie School of Public Service, University of Southern Maine, the committee identified what they believed to be guiding principles and recommended actions on long term care.
The only person outside of the legislature who participated in the committee discussions was the State Long Term Care Ombudsman, included because she was believed to represent a knowledgeable, impartial and objective viewpoint.
In January 2000 they published their report on long-term care in Maine in which three guiding principles were identified: * Maine's long-term care system should be comprehensive and flexible and should be designed to meet the needs and preferences of consumers; * Maine's long term care system should enhance the lives and safety of consumers; and * Maine's long-term care system should provide high-quality, cost-effective, affordable care through partnerships between providers of care and the state.
Within each guiding principle, recommendations and proposals for immediate action were identified by the committee.
The Best Practices workshops and minimum staffing ratios were proposed under the second guiding principle and its accompanying recommendation that, "All long term care services should be adequately and appropriately staffed."
A committee consisting of the State Ombudsman, representatives from the Maine Health Care Association, the Maine Hospital Association, the Division of Licensing and Certification, the Alzheimer Association and Legal Services for the Elderly was formed to identify topics for educational programming.
The minimum staffing ratios were studied by a Task Force, consisting of representatives from the Division of Licensing and Certification, providers, the Ombudsman, legislators, nursing and nursing assistants.
They originally wanted to identify an acuity-based formula to determine staffing ratios, but were unable to identify an acceptable measurement and eventually abandoned the idea.
The proposed increase in minimum nurse staffing ratios was initially met with some skepticism on the part of providers.
However, when the for-profit association canvassed the members as to their ability to meet the minimum requirements, providers responded that they were currently meeting the staffing requirements and did not see it as a problem.
The association was pleased to be able to support the legislation that was seen as a positive move for residents and consumers.
The language of the legislation when finalized, however, required that the minimum direct care staffing ratios be met every shift every day.
Facilities, when indicating their ability to meet the ratios had based their responses on staffing in the aggregate, over weeks or months.
The regulation allows for staff to be aggregated over the entire building (not by unit), but must be met each shift (morning, evening and night).
The association had requested language be included in the law that facilities would not be cited if they had made an effort to cover the shift(s) so long as there was no harm to residents.
This addition was not included in the final regulation.
The funding for a consumer satisfaction survey was introduced under the third principle and the accompanying recommendation that, "The Department of Human Services should enhance its efforts to provide technical assistance to long-term care providers in the spirit of continuous quality improvement.
While the Department should not abandon its oversight role regarding providers, it should offer positive and constructive consultation to providers whenever possible."
Consumer and family satisfaction surveys were listed as one method of measuring high quality care.
Overall Intent/Vision for Maine's Quality Improvement Programs
There are two goals identified for the Behavioral Consultative services.
The first is that by assisting facilities to provide better services, the risk of abuse and neglect of these residents with problem behaviors will be reduced.
Secondly, the number of discharges of these residents from facilities because the facility cannot deal with the resident will also be reduced.
Best Practices, Consumer Satisfaction and Minimum Nurse Staffing Ratios are intended to improve quality outcomes, according the legislative study.
Best Practices and minimum staffing were envisioned as means to enhance the lives and safety of the consumers.
The committee developing the educational Best Practice programs sought to provide both regulatory and practical guidance for facilities on meeting resident needs.
Innovative ideas from nursing facilities were solicited to aid other facilities in maximizing quality outcomes within the confines of limited staffing resources.
Contacts in the Ombudsman office believe that a multidimensional approach to measure quality is necessary--no single measure can do an adequate job.
They expressed their belief that the consumer satisfaction survey would be one component along with quality measures and enforcement activities to improve quality for Maine long-term care residents.
Description of Quality Improvement Programs in Maine
This section includes a brief description of each of Maine's quality improvement programs followed by a discussion of program funding, governance and the management and staffing structure.
The following quality improvement programs were reviewed: * Behavior Consultation; * Best Practices; and * Minimum Staffing Ratios.
Behavior Consultation
Laura Cote RN is the sole technical assistant in Maine, providing on-site consultation to any long-term care facility (nursing facilities, assisted living facilities, intermediate care for the mentally ill, facilities caring for head injured, adult family care homes and boarding homes) on problem resident behaviors any where in the state.
Growing out of her experience as a member of a transition team closing a facility that cared for primarily psychiatric residents, she became aware of the need for support and education for long term care staff.
She currently provides consultations in the morning and inservice programs in the afternoons on a full-time basis, working from her home office.
Technically an employee of the Division of Licensing and Certification, she receives referrals from facilities and schedules on-site visits and inservice programs throughout the state.
Ms. Cote describes the goals of these services as "to assist staff in dealing more effectively with difficult behaviors by giving them a better understanding of the resident, why the behaviors are occurring, making recommendations, involving them in team problem solving where their input is valued, and providing them the education that will enable them to do their jobs more effectively and safely--as well as improving quality of care and ultimately quality of life for the resident."^6 Ms. Cote, depending on the severity of the problem, prioritizes responses to facility requests.
Visits are generally made within two weeks of the request.
Inservice programs are very popular and are currently being booked well into 2003.
On-site consultation visits involve a chart review, problem-solving sessions with staff (including all staff involved in care), a brief meeting with the resident, written recommendations, and a follow up if needed.
When speaking with the staff during the problem solving session, they discuss the problem behaviors in detail, including what the warning signs are, what helps, and what doesn't help.
Using staff input, she writes her recommendations by hand because she believes that they are more personal.
The recommendations are geared to the care providers and reflect the information that they offered in the earlier session.
Copies of her recommendations are forwarded to the facility and to the Division of Licensing and Certification.
Facility recommendations are available for surveyors' review although facilities are not held accountable for implementing Ms. Cote's recommendations.
Appendix B contains a sample of the facility feedback report that is prepared at the end of a behavioral consultation visit.
Ms. Cote has also developed seven in-service programs, which she conducts at facilities on request.
Program topics include: Behavioral Approach, Documentation of Behaviors, Alzheimer's--Practical Hints for Caregivers, Intimidating Behaviors, Problem Solving for Difficult Behaviors, Behavior Profile Cards, and Elopement--Risk Factors and Prevention.
In-service outlines are included in Appendix B.
No formal evaluation has been done, but Ms. Cote distributes evaluation sheets intermittently to see if there are ways she can improve her service.
Best Practices
Best Practice workshops were mandated as part of the April 2000 legislation to address nursing home issues.
The Department of Human Services was charged with participating in a "series of best practices forums to provide educational workshops and opportunities to providers of long term care services."
Led by the Assistant Director of Licensing and Certification, a task force was assembled to implement the legislation.
Beginning first with determining a definition of a best practice the task force proceeded to identify topics and plan two workshop programs.
The first program on Nutrition and Hydration was an all day workshop offered in two locations.
It began with a presentation on the federal regulations regarding nutrition and hydration led by a federal surveyor followed by a panel presentation by providers who discussed nutritional practices that worked best for them.
Prior to the workshop, all providers in the state had been asked to submit examples of nutritional best practices.
Panel participants were selected from those who had provided a best practice.
The audience included administrators, directors of nursing, staff nurses and nursing assistants.
The Licensing and Certification division reported that 90 percent of all homes in the state sent staff to one of the workshops.
The second program was on Incontinence and featured an expert speaker.
The audience consisted mainly of nurses because of the more clinical nature of the forum.
The second workshop was not as well attended as the first due to inclement weather on the scheduled date.
No formal evaluation of the impact of either program has been conducted as yet.
Minimum Staffing Ratios
Also included in the April 2000 legislative mandate was an increase in nurse staffing requirements.
Nurse staffing is defined in terms of ratios of direct care staff to residents by shift.
Direct care staff include charge nurses, medication nurses and aides and nursing assistants, but not nurse managers, supervisors, directors of nursing or MDS coordinators.
Day shift ratios increased from 1:8 to 1:5; evening shift ratios increased from 1:12 to 1:10; and night shift ratios increased from 1:20 to 1:15.
Staffing is reviewed during the annual survey (and during any complaint investigations related to staffing) for a two-week period prior to the date of survey.
If problems are noted, surveyors will review other periods as well.
If a facility is out of compliance on one shift on one day, they may be cited.
Consumer Satisfaction Survey
Funds to develop a consumer satisfaction survey were included in the April 2000 legislation.
Proposals were solicited and a contract was awarded in the Fall of 2002 to Market Decisions, LLC, a Maine survey research firm.
This company will conduct a face-to-face survey of a sample of nursing facility residents to determine their satisfaction with their surroundings and the care they receive.
The study report is expected in late Spring 2003.
Program Funding
The Behavioral Consultation program services are available to any long-term care facility in the state of Maine at no cost to the facility or the resident.
The cost of this program is Ms. Cote's salary and administrative support, which is part of the Licensing and Certification budget.
The funding for the Best Practices program comes from money obtained through civil money penalties.
The cost of each forum was estimated to range from under $2000 to approximately $3000.
The costs were incurred to reserve conference space, to transport the surveyors to the forum, and to cover the cost of the speaker.
Funding to increase minimum staffing included $1,336,000 from general funds and $2,610,241 for the associated federal match for fiscal year 2000-2001.
Governance of Programs
The behavioral consultation, best practices and minimum staffing requirements are all administered through the Bureau of Medical Services, the Department of Human Services.
Management and Staffing
Technical assistance visits are conducted solely by Ms. Cote, who is a registered nurse (RN) with geriatric and psychiatric training, in addition to many years of acute, home and long-term care experience.
She is employed by Licensing and Certification, but is not trained as a surveyor and does not participate in surveyor meetings or activities.
She works independently from an office in her home and provides copies of her facility recommendations and summary reports to her supervisor on a weekly basis.
Aspects of Maine's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to Work Well
The Behavioral Consultation offered in Maine is well received partially because although organizationally housed within the Division of Licensing and Certification, it is completely separate from regulatory activities and because there is no cost involved for facilities.
Contributing equally to the program's effectiveness is the experience and qualifications of the individual who is solely responsible for it's structure and content.
Laura Cote is seen as knowledgeable, credible, familiar with the long-term care environment and able to communicate well with both licensed and unlicensed staff.
Because Ms. Cote works from her home, facility staff were often not aware that technically she works within the Division of Licensing and Certification.
Participants were unanimous that Ms. Cote's consultation was helpful not only to residents but to staff as well.
One director of nursing stated that by soliciting staff input, particularly from nursing assistants that Ms. Cote was able to diffuse difficult situations that could potentially lead to physical and/or verbal abuse.
Ms. Cote has a reputation of being able to glean from a record relevant care information that staff had either missed or considered insignificant.
Another nursing director noted that even though the problem behaviors often could not be eliminated, the discussion around them gave all levels of staff, the nursing assistants in particular, insight as to why these behaviors were occurring and support to continue their efforts at dealing with them.
The separation from the surveyors makes the facility staff feel comfortable interacting with Ms. Cote.
One director of nursing noted that often their record of having consulted with Ms. Cote improved survey outcomes as it demonstrated to the surveyors that the facility was taking appropriate action to improve certain problematic situations.
Providers noted that the careplans that Ms. Cote develops and leaves with the facility were organized, detailed and very useful, but emphasized that the process of speaking with (and listening to) staff was an equally important part of her service.
The inservice programs that Ms. Cote offers were noted to be well attended, to the degree that facility staff came in on their days off so as not to miss them.
Nursing directors explained that Ms. Cote's presentations are "down to earth," and appropriate for all staff.
The programs include many examples from Ms. Cote's own experience that staff are able to relate to and learn from.
Providers also praised the Best Practices workshops and hoped that additional ones would be planned.
The panel discussion that occurred as part of the Nutrition and Hydration workshop was noted to be particularly helpful.
One nursing director stated that their facility had initiated some new approaches to dining after attending that workshop and had adopted some of the ideas into their quality improvement program.
Aspects of Maine's Quality Improvement Programs Noted to be Less Successful
Although participants were overwhelmingly pleased with Laura Cote's work providing behavioral consultation for nursing facilities, some noted that having only one person to cover the entire state did not allow adequate follow-up activities with facilities.
With additional staff more inservices could be provided, response time could be shortened (although not considered a problem by facility staff contacted) and a greater degree of follow-up consultation could be provided.
The minimum staffing requirement, although no one would disagree that it was an important component to improving quality, was difficult for facilities to meet in view of the current nursing shortage in the state.
Facilities reported having trouble finding an adequate number of qualified staff before the required staffing was increased and now frequently have to rely on temporary agency staff, a practice they feel does not contribute to quality of care.
When initially proposed, the required staffing was discussed in the aggregate and not as ratios of direct care staff per shift.
Facilities are reportedly being cited for numbers below the requirement.
One facility stated they had been cited for staffing on the day shift of 5.06 residents per direct care worker when the requirement was 5.00 residents per staff person.
Facilities also stated they would have preferred a greater degree of flexibility in the regulation so that they could staff according to their residents' needs--staffing even higher than required during certain peak times of the day and less when residents' needs were less intense.
Staffing below the required numbers is supposed to lead to a self-imposed moratorium on admissions.
Facilities that are Medicaid certified must maintain a 90 percent occupancy rate to avoid having their funding affected.
This creates a difficult situation where facilities must chose between regulatory and financial compliance.
Impact of Maine's Quality Improvement Programs on Quality of Life/Quality of Care
Participants believed that the quality of life for residents referred to Ms. Cote for behavioral consultation was definitely improved because staff are able to provide better care to this difficult population.
Although no formal evaluation has been conducted, anecdotal feedback from survey staff, ombudsman and providers indicated that the consultations have led to changes in plans of care that have had positive results for both residents and staff.
The survey staff respondent indicated that based on informal feedback she has received, the education and support given to staff has decreased medication use among the residents and has also decreased the number of discharges due to behavioral issues.
In her experience, in homes without support, the staff had on occasion become so frustrated with problem residents they would discharge the resident to an acute care setting and refuse to readmit them, preferring to take the deficiency citation rather than continue dealing with the resident.
There has been no formal evaluation of the impact that the Best Practices program or the increase in minimum staffing requirements have had on quality of care or quality of life.
Providers reported adopting ideas presented at the Best Practices workshop, particularly the one on Nutrition and Hydration and incorporating these practices in to their quality improvement programs.
Sustainability and Lessons Learned
Participants did not indicate any plans to change the behavioral consultation visits, although some recommended that expanding the program would be advantageous.
Current budget constraints limit any plans in this direction.
The survey respondent stated that any additional funds would most likely to be used to hire more surveyors.
The legislative mandate that created the Best Practices program was not specific to the number of educational programs that were to be provided, except to state that the "Department of Human Services will participate in a series of best practices forums..."
The survey respondent who headed up the program planned to reconvene the program's Task Force to begin planning future activities.
Some ideas, although not firm were to investigate activities in this area in other states and/or possibly make Best Practices available in some sort of publication.
There was some discussion by participants to re-examine the minimum staffing requirement.
Although all contacts voiced support for the principle of improved staffing, there were some thoughts of possibly modifying the language of the regulation to allow facility staff more latitude in managing the numbers.
Proponents of the increased minimum ratios did not want to have to go back to the legislature to re-write the regulation, but rather were hoping for increased flexibility in the interpretation of the regulation in view of the current nursing labor shortage.
Participants advised other states that funding passed to implement increased staffing should be proposed as ongoing and not limited to the year the measure was passed.
When questioned regarding recommendations for other states, participants enthusiastically advised that, "Every state should have a Laura Cote."
One respondent cautioned, however, that every state is unique and what works in one state may not work in another.
This comment addressed the fact that Ms. Cote works alone covering the whole state and that often facilities wait up to two weeks for a requested consultation.
Facilities in Maine accepted the two-week wait for consultative visits, possibly because many of them are located in rural areas, and are accustomed to not having services readily available.
Participants advised that with any consultative or technical assistance program that the qualifications and experience of the hired consultants was critical.
For behavioral consultations to be successful, they noted that a potential consultant needed to be well versed in clinical, psychiatric and long-term care issues.
Because of the diversity of diagnoses present in the long term care population, being an expert in only one of the aforementioned areas would not be adequate to provide facilities with valid and useful information.
Role of the Federal Government in Quality Improvement
The Ombudsman stated that regulations alone are not enough to improve quality.
She believes that multiple and varied approaches must be utilized to assist facilities in their quality efforts.
Adequate numbers of, and respect for, staff is one such area.
Another approach involves improving access for facilities to clinical informational resources and the provision of technical assistance.
Lastly she pointed out that efforts to decrease staff turnover must occur.
According to the Ombudsman, the role of the Federal Government should be to provide education.
The survey agency respondent agreed stating that the Federal Government should continue to provide enforcement but also add training and initiatives focused on helping facilities deal with problems.
Providers had expressed interest in accessing information on Best Practices, particularly in the areas of pain management and elopement.
Summary and Conclusions
Maine's quality improvement programs consist of the long-standing but limited behavioral consultation and the recently enacted educational and staffing requirements.
Both programs have limitations--the technical assistance is very limited in scope and focus and the Best Practices and minimum staffing requirements have been underway for just one year.
The programs, however, include distinct features in their development and continuing processes that distinguish them from other states and which could serve as valuable models to other states.
The technical assistance program involves one nurse providing behavioral consultation statewide to any long-term facility upon request.
Its success in improving resident outcomes through a combination of consultative and educational support is apparent, although not formally proven.
On a small scale it demonstrates the value of an individual facility/resident approach, the need to involve all staff in care planning and problem solving, and the benefits of distancing technical assistance from enforcement activities and of providing education that is tailored to the direct care staff.
Although only two Best Practices workshops have been presented, one of them utilized a unique approach of incorporating information on regulatory compliance with practical implementation guidance.
A surveyor provided interpretation of regulations followed by a panel discussion/presentations by facilities that had submitted best practices around a particular clinical area.
This combination of reporting enforcement interpretation and successful clinical outcomes captured the attention and interest of administration and clinical staff with subsequent changes in policy and care planning.
Lastly, the manner in which the legislation covering the quality improvement programs was written was an attempt by the legislature to first identify guiding principles and goals and then use them to develop a targeted approach to accomplish the goals, rather than reacting to isolated issues.
The development of a framework for how the Maine long-term care system should operate and the identification of key principles to guide public policy decisions on long-term care was seen as a novel approach.
It remains to be seen how and to what degree these principles will impact future long-term care legislation.
References
AHCA.
State Summaries of Nursing Facilities, 2001/www.ahca.org/research/keynotes/statefactsheets-2001.pdf.
State of Maine Public Law 49, Chapter 731, Part BBBB, Sections BBBB-1 through BBBB-16, Signed April 25, 2000.
State of Maine, 119^th Legislature, Second Regular Session, "Long Term Care in Maine--A Progress Report."
Joint Standing Committee on Health and Human Services, January 2000.
State of Maine, "Long Term Care Status Report, Bureau of Elder and Adult Services, December 2002.
(http://www.state.me.us/dhs/beas/ltc/2002/ltc_2002.htm#nursing).
MARYLAND
Overview of the Maryland Site Visit
This report describes findings from our exploration of the State of Maryland's quality improvement projects (QIPs).
We first present some background information about Maryland and about the project team's site visit to that state.
Next, a history and rationale for Maryland's movement toward state-initiated quality improvement is presented.
This is followed by a description of each program reviewed by the project team.
Findings regarding the strengths and weaknesses (as identified by state and nursing home industry representatives) are presented, as is a discussion of the impact of the QIPs on quality of care and quality of life of nursing facility residents.
Finally, lessons learned by the state are presented, along with a brief description of the perceived sustainability of the various QIPs.
Background
Following the completion of the literature review, discussions with stakeholders and the meeting of the Technical Advisory Group, Maryland was identified as one of seven states meeting the project criteria for states with state-initiated quality improvement programs.
These criteria include (1) having state-initiated programs in place, (2) having programs that were not reimbursement or payment related, and which (3) included aspects of technical assistance and/or quality improvement.
In response to concerns from within the state and the nation at large, Maryland had enacted a number of measures aimed at improving the quality of care in nursing homes.
Some (e.g., the quality improvement plan, the "Second Survey") were regulatory measures, while others ranged from educational services to research endeavors that were voluntary programs.
Maryland was identified as the initial site visit because their technical assistance and quality improvement programs had been underway for approximately one year and the state is in close geographic proximity to Massachusetts and Washington, D.C. where members of the research team are located.
Participants
Abt staff members Terry Moore and Donna Hurd accompanied by Task Order Officer Jennie Harvell and consultant Barbara Manard met with individuals involved in the development, management and implementation of the programs, and with nursing facility staff that had been surveyed under the technical assistance program.
Over a three-day visit in April 2002, the research team met with individuals and groups associated with the following organizations: * Maryland Department of Health and Mental Hygiene/Office of Health Care Quality (OHCQ) + Carol Benner, Director + Gene Heisler, Deputy Director + William Vaughan RN, Chief Nurse + Mark Kirwan RN, Surveyor + Carmen Ulgen RD, LD, Surveyor + LeeAnn Wheatley RN, Surveyor + Linda Masterson RN, Special Assistant for Technical Assistance + Tina Malara, RN, Surveyor + Hollie Kratzer, RN, Surveyor
* Life Span--the American Association of Home and Services for the Aging affiliate in Maryland + Isabella Firth, President
* Health Facilities Association of Maryland (HFAM) (the American Health Care Association affiliate) + Adele Wilzack, President + Mark Woodward, Government Relations + Fran Miller, Clinical Director + Margaret Chapin, QI Committee Co-Chair + RNs from member facilities
* Maryland Department of Aging + Fran Stoner, Ombudsman + Pat Bayliss, State Long Term Care Ombudsman + Michael Lemouth, Field Coordinator + Lenora Yancy, Baltimore County + Carol Perkins, Carroll County
* Continuing Care Retirement Community with 79 skilled beds + Not-for-profit corporation + Administrator, Director of Nursing, Medical Director, Social Worker
* 130 bed not-for-profit nursing facility + Administrator, Director of Nursing, Quality Assurance Nurse
* FutureCare Health and Management Corporation + Melanie Cox, MS, RN
Carol Benner, OHCQ director, was the primary contact for the Maryland site visit.
With 14 years experience in her position and author of the state's nursing home reform package, she was an excellent resource on the political environment in her agency and the state at large.
During the preparation phase and on-site discussions, she was a willing and enthusiastic informant on the various reform programs in place.
Likewise, the Technical Assistance Surveyors and other members of the OHCQ staff were willing to share their experiences and impressions of the impact of the program.
Some of the provider representatives were initially more guarded in their presentation and focused their discussions on the issues that they felt were most important to their members.
Other provider representatives were less concerned about staffing and funding issues and were more open to giving us their comments about the variety of quality improvement programs initiated by the state.
Preparation
Prior to the on-site visit, factual information on the quality improvement programs was gathered from the literature review, stakeholder discussions and Maryland state web site.
Information on the following aspects of the programs was gathered and organized in a table: * Program title including a regulatory reference, if applicable; * Program description; * Agency contact--the person(s) most knowledgeable about the program protocols and implementation to date; * Impetus--what prompted the development of the program; * Designer--identify the individual(s) or group(s) responsible for program design and indicate agency affiliation(s); * Goals--state the program objectives; * Funding Source and Amount--state current funding amounts/sources and projections for future periods; * Program Staff--indicate how many individuals are involved in the program implementation including administrative support, what is the organizational structure; * Facility Involvement--is this a requirement for all facilities or a voluntary program, how are facilities selected for inclusion, if voluntary? * Dates--what are the program beginning and end dates; * Evaluation--indicate current and planned formal evaluation program(s).
The table was forwarded to Carol Benner prior to the on-site visit for her to review and provide any additional or corrected information.
The research team used the factual information in the table as a starting point to develop discussion guides that focused on more in-depth issues.
Letters of endorsement explaining the project goals, state selection and planned discussions were formulated and sent to prospective discussants.
Follow-up phone calls were made to arrange for convenient dates and times for in-person meetings.
Structure
Discussions with the survey agency staff, provider associations, ombudsman and nursing facility staff took place at their respective offices or on-site at the nursing facility and generally lasted approximately two hours per conversation.
In each case, the research team encouraged the organization, agency or nursing facility to include as many of their staff as they thought would be interested or would have valuable information to share.
The research team was able to observe a portion of a technical assistance survey on site.
During a break in the technical assistance survey, the research team met briefly to talk with the surveyors and then observed the technical assistance process as surveyors discussed their findings with the facility staff.
Discussions were generally structured with one researcher presenting both prepared and spontaneous questions while the other researchers recorded responses in writing.
A Brief Description of Maryland's Nursing Home Industry
To put Maryland in context with other health care environments around the country, and with others studied here, we describe several characteristics of the state's nursing home environment.
Comparative data presented are from the AHCA web site (AHCA, 2002).
Maryland facilities are slightly larger than those in the rest of the country, with an average of 121 beds per facility (vs. 108).
Fewer of Maryland's facilities are for-profit (57 percent vs. 65 percent), 13 percent are hospital-based, and 50 percent are chain-owned.
There are a total of 262 facilities in the State, the majority of which (89.7 percent) are dually certified for Medicare and Medicaid.
Impetus for QIPs
The impetus for the enactment of the Maryland quality improvement programs in 2000 as explained by the provider associations and the survey agency appears to have been based on a series of events and activities that occurred both within and outside the state in the preceding ten years.
Beginning in 1989, deplorable conditions existing in a Maryland facility were reported in the media, which led (over the next three years) to multiple nursing facility closures.
In 1997, findings from the California study of death certificates were published in Time Magazine.
This led to a U.S.
General Accounting Office (GAO) investigation in 1998 on California nursing homes (USGAO, 1998) and in 1999 on federal and state complaint and enforcement practices (USGAO, 1999).
The 1999 GAO study noted problems with Maryland's complaint investigations, stating that the process was too slow.
That same year, negative personal experiences by several influential state senators in Maryland nursing homes, along with damaging testimony before the legislature by OHCQ staff on the issue of complaints, pressed the legislature to tie the passage of a nursing home funding bill to the creation of a Nursing Home Task Force to study quality and oversight in Maryland.
The for-profit provider association explained to the project team that their primary concern at that time was the restoration of full Medicaid funding that was promised in the bill.
Although both provider associations indicated that they did not agree with the proposed member composition of the Task Force, specifically that stakeholders were included only on subcommittees, they were compelled to support the bill to ensure funding.
The Task Force began meeting during the summer of 1999 and presented their recommendations in January 2000.
The Task Force identified the following: * Nursing home care in Maryland is deficient; * The regulatory system needs to be strengthened; and * Serious staffing issues exist requiring development of the workforce in Maryland nursing homes.
In May 2000 a broad Nursing Home Reform Package was introduced containing six bills covering the following areas: * Continued legislative oversight through the Quality Task Force; * Addition of a second annual survey for each nursing home; * Licensure standards that included mandated internal Quality Assurance Programs, qualifications for medical directors, standards for physician accountability, and mandated posting of staff within each home; * Strengthened state sanctions and penalties; * Additional Medicaid funding to the nursing homes to hire more nursing staff, improve benefits to stabilize the work force; * Increases in Ombudsman staff.
Carol Benner explained that the six bills, which she wrote, represented a "six prong approach to improve quality."
She stated that the general approach in the past had been to strengthen regulations and sanctions to weed out the bad providers, but that there had been no provisions to address quality.
According to Benner, at the heart of the bills was the quality improvement program.
HFAM reported that the key aspect of the legislation had to do with Medicaid funding for additional staffing and benefits.
Within each specific bill, there were components that the various stakeholders pushed to modify; however, no bill was defeated in its entirety.
One provider explained that members of the Task Force agreed on the principles of the reform but differed on the operationalization of reforms and the timing for implementation.
For example, Benner had proposed that the quality improvement programs in each facility be lead by a full-time nurse.
Due to opposition by HFAM, this was modified to remove the requirement of a nurse.
The legislature had initially promoted four surveys per year while the survey agency and provider groups were satisfied with two surveys.
The final bill passed called for two nursing home surveys per year.
Overall Intent/Vision for QIPs
Comments from the provider associations and the survey agency, and the language of the legislature, all differ in the emphasis that they place on the various components of the quality improvement programs.
There were clearly additional regulations introduced to strengthen the survey agency's oversight and ability to sanction; at the same time, provisions were added for greater consumer advocacy and technical assistance.
The language in the proposed legislation stated that the bills were drafted because it had become clear to everyone that the nursing home industry needed significant reform to improve the quality of life for residents.
The proposal was aimed at strengthening state regulations in areas where the applicable federal standard was not sufficient to protect the public health, safety or welfare of Maryland citizens.
The proposal identifies areas that federal regulations either do not address or are deemed to be too weak.
Federal regulations do not address the relocation of residents or appropriate procedures to minimize relocation trauma, nor do they address the posting of staffing ratios and staff assignments, which Maryland legislators wanted to see defined.
Federal regulations for quality assurance were also seen as deficient, not going far enough in terms of defining the framework for an acceptable quality improvement program.
According to Carol Benner, the purpose of the nursing home reform was to "give [the state] effective tools to gain and sustain compliance in Maryland homes."
She noted a need to change the culture of both surveyors and nursing facility staff to focus on quality and resident safety, as opposed to regulation and enforcement.
She also stated that, "although the survey agency seems to be effective at removing poor performing nursing homes from the system, there is no evidence that the current survey process is effective at improving quality.
In fact, little is known about what does improve quality in nursing homes.
To improve quality, Maryland is trying a variety of efforts."
In one presentation she stated, "We decided to do anything that worked to improve quality--the 'throw the spaghetti at the refrigerator and see what sticks' approach."
Description of State-Initiated Quality Improvement Programs in Maryland
The quality improvement programs that were initiated by legislation passed in the Maryland General Assembly are described in detail below.
They are followed by a description of programs initiated by OHCQ, subsequent to the passage of the Maryland Nursing Home Reform Act, in an effort to improve nursing home performance.
Programs and regulations mandated by the Nursing Home Reform Act
The programs described below are directed at nursing facilities and resulted from Maryland's nursing home reform package; all receive oversight from OHCQ.
No additional funding was appropriated to assist facilities in their implementation or to assist OHCQ in their enforcement.
Facility Quality Assurance Program (COMAR 10.07.02.45)
As of January 1, 2001, legislation mandated that each Maryland nursing facility establish an effective quality assurance program.
The program was developed by the Nursing Home Task Force (described earlier) with the goal of changing the culture within the nursing home from one of living from survey to survey, to one focused on internal quality improvement.
It contains guidance that exceeds the existing applicable federal regulations on nursing home quality assurance programs (42 CFR 483.75(o)).
Program requirements include the appointment of a qualified individual to manage quality assurance activities within the nursing facility, and the creation of a quality assurance (QA) committee.
The regulation is silent with regard to the qualifications of the individual who must manage the QA activities, and OHCQ staff describe this position as being held by directors of nursing, administrators, QA nurses, and others.
Membership of the QA committee must include at least the director of nursing, the administrator, the medical director, and a social worker, dietician, and geriatric nursing assistant.
The committee must designate a chairperson to manage committee activities, must meet monthly to implement the QA plan, and must prepare monthly reports for the ombudsman, family council and resident's council.
Quality assurance records must be available to the OHCQ for the purposes of ensuring implementation and effectiveness of the program.
The QA committee's primary responsibility is to assist in developing and approving the facility's initial quality assurance plan, and for assisting in the on-going implementation of that plan.
They are responsible for submitting the QA plan to the OHCQ at the time of licensure or at the time of license renewal, and submitting any change in the QA plan to the OHCQ within 30 days of the change.
They are also responsible for reviewing and approving the facility's QA plan at least yearly.
Quality Assurance Plan (COMAR 10.07.02.46)
The QA plan must include procedures for concurrent review of resident status, ongoing monitoring of resident status, handling and reporting of patient complaints, procedures for accidents and incidents, and procedures for implementing abuse and neglect regulations (e.g., family notification).
* Concurrent review consists of daily rounds by a licensed nurse to determine any changes in each resident's physical or mental status.
The facility's QA plan must include the procedure for conducting the review, criteria used to determine a change in condition, methods for documenting the review, and identification of the nurse conducting the review.
It must also include a procedure to evaluate clinical data for any resident with a change in status, as well as procedures outlining what action to take when there is a change of condition noted.
The clinical data to be evaluated must include at least medications, laboratory values, intake and output, skin breakdown, weights, appetite, injuries and any other parameter that may affect the patient's physical or mental status.
Additionally, the QA plan must describe a process for the referral of data to the QA committee when appropriate.
* Ongoing monitoring is required for all aspects of resident care and must be accompanied by measurable criteria for evaluating patient status in the following areas: + medication administration; + prevention of pressure ulcers; + dehydration and malnutrition; + nutritional status and weight loss/gain; + accidents and injuries; + unexpected death; and + changes in physical and mental status.
The QA plan must also include methodology for data collection and evaluation in these patient care areas, analysis of data to determine trends, description of the thresholds and performance parameters, timeframes for follow-up, and description of documentation.
Essentially, the "concurrent review" component of the QA Plan requirement prescribes to the facility that resident status must be evaluated daily and must be evaluated in specific aspects of resident functioning (e.g., appetite, skin).
The ongoing monitoring component of the QA Plan prescribes particular quality indicators for which the facility will be held accountable.
For example, all Maryland facilities must monitor patient outcomes in the seven specified areas (e.g., medication administration, pressure ulcers) listed above.
* Patient complaints--The QA plan must include a description of a complaint process that effectively addresses resident or family concerns.
It must identify the designated person(s) and phone numbers to receive complaints or concerns, the method to be used to acknowledge complaints received, and the time frames for investigating complaints dependent upon the nature or seriousness of the complaint.
The QA plan must also include a description of a logging system that will be used including the name of the complainant, the date that the complaint was received, the nature of the complaint, and the date that the complainant was notified of the disposition or resolution of the complaint.
The QA plan shall also include procedures for notifying residents of their right to file a complaint with OHCQ, informing residents, families or guardians of the complaint process upon admission and posting the complaint process or making it available without the need to request it.
* Accidents and incidents--The QA plan must include a definition of accident and injury that is appropriate to the type of resident served by the nursing home.
It must describe the procedure for reporting accidents and injuries including who shall report incidents, the time frame for reporting incidents, and the procedure for reporting incidents.
A description of how internal investigations of accidents and injuries will be handled including time frames for conducting the investigation, methods for assessment of any injury, interview of the resident, staff, and witness, and review of any relevant records including the resident's medical records, discharge summary, hospital records, etc. and how information will be referred to the QA committee.
It must describe the process for notifying family or guardian about the incident, the process of notifying the QA committee and the process for ongoing evaluation to identify trends.
It must also contain a policy statement saying that reporting incidents can be done without fear of reprisal.
* Abuse and neglect--The QA plan must include a description of the process for implementing abuse regulations, including the family notification process, the evaluative process for identifying trends and patterns, and a description of how information will be shared with the QA committee.
Though the QA Plans are submitted to the state, all of the described components of the QA Plan requirement are not reviewed until the technical assistance, or "second", survey (described later in this document).
Each component of the plan, as well as the status of the implementation of the plan, is reviewed and discussed with each facility by the State Quality Assurance Nurses.
The following requirements were also enacted through the Maryland Nursing Home Reform legislation.
Posting of Staffing (COMAR 10.07.02.48)
This statute requires each nursing home to post on each floor or unit, for each shift, a notice that explains the ratio of licensed and unlicensed staff to residents.
The posting includes names of the staff members on duty and the room numbers of the residents that each is assigned to, the name of the charge nurse or person in charge of the unit, and the name of the person responsible for medication administration.
At the time of our visit, approximately 65 percent of facilities were deemed to be in compliance with this regulation.
Mandated Staffing Patterns (COMAR 10.07.02.50)
In cases where the OHCQ determines that a deficiency or deficiencies exist, the Department may either mandate a staff pattern which specifies the number of personnel or personnel qualifications or both; or permit the facility the opportunity to correct the deficiencies by a specific date.
If the facility does not correct the deficiency, OHCQ has the authority to specify the number of personnel or personnel qualifications or both.
Health Care Quality Account (COMAR 10.07.02.60)
In addition to the previously existing federal regulations, the Department has established a health care quality account funded by civil money penalties paid by nursing homes.
Expenditure of the funds can be made for any purpose that will directly improve quality of care in nursing facilities and may include funding for the establishment and operation of a demonstration project, a grant award, or relocation of residents in crisis situations.
The account may also be used or to fund educational programs to nursing facilities, the OHCQ, other government, professional, or advocacy agencies and consumers.
Suggestions for the use of the funds may be submitted by members of the public, advocacy organizations, government agencies, professional organizations including trade associations, nursing homes; and nursing home associations.
At the time of our visit, there was $230,000 in the state account and $1,300,000 in the federal account.
OHCQ recently introduced a budget amendment to allow them to use money from the account for the Wellspring program.
Previously, funds have been used for the Family Council Project, the Wellspring Project, Pets-on-Wheels, training, relocation services and end-of-life care.
Physician Services (COMAR 10.07.02.10)
The goal of this regulation is to improve physician accountability in nursing homes.
It includes detailed regulations covering physician responsibility for assessment, visits, orders, documentation, the provision of appropriate care and adequate coverage.
Medical Director Qualifications (COMAR 10.07.02.11)
This regulation strengthens requirements for medical directors.
It requires that the medical director act as a manager and administrator, attend QA meetings, perform peer review, and ensure that resident care meets accepted standards.
Medical directors must have current license as a physician in the state, must have at least 2 years experience or specialized training in geriatrics or care of chronically ill and impaired residents, must have demonstrated successful completion of a curriculum in physician management or administration, and must have privileges at a hospital in the state, be a participant in an HMO network, or be credentialed by a credentialing organization approved by the Maryland Department of Health and Mental Hygiene.
Related Nursing Home Legislation
In addition to the quality initiatives described above, several other regulations were passed by the Maryland General Assembly as part of the nursing home reform package that were not evaluated for this study (as they do not meet our criteria for state-initiated quality improvement programs).
They include regulations related to enforcement actions, and include: relocation of residents (COMAR 10.07.02.47); sanctions (.49); civil money penalties (.52, .53, .54, .55); criminal penalties (.56); emergency suspension (.57); license denial or revocation (.58); and hearings (.59).
Complete descriptions of the legislation can be found at www.dsd.state.md.us.
Additional Quality Improvement Programs Undertaken by OHCQ
To supplement the changes mandated by legislation passed by the Nursing Home Reform Act, OHCQ has taken several organizational steps to try to improve nursing facility quality.
Forty surveyors have been added since 1999 (doubling the number of surveyors on staff), a Chief Nurse and a Medical Director have been appointed, and a Technical Assistance Unit and Abuse Unit have been established.
In addition, OHCQ has initiated the following programs as part of the effort to improve nursing home quality within the state.
State Technical Assistance Unit--Quality Assurance Survey
In November 2000, a Technical Assistance Unit was established in the OHCQ to encourage compliance efforts and best practices.
The unit consists of a team of five nurses, one dietician, and a manager who are separate from and independent of the federal survey team.
This unit is supported by $400,000 in state general funds.
The state believed that the use of federal funds would limit its flexibility.
The OHCQ received $250,000 from operations for the program.
The team performs a second annual survey, the Quality Assurance Survey, at each Maryland nursing facility.
While no legislation mandates a specific quality related survey, regulations require two annual surveys be performed for each facility.
OHCQ has chosen to design the "Second Survey" to focus on quality assurance, technical assistance, and sharing of best practices.
The survey is unannounced, as required by Maryland law.
It is intended to be collegial and consultative, rather than punitive, and total separation is maintained between the technical assistance survey and the federal certification survey.
When serious violations are identified as part of the second survey, the QA team brings these to the attention of the nursing home staff and requires a plan of correction.
Unless the violations are of an egregious nature and threaten resident safety, the QA team continues to track the violations and provides follow-up to ensure corrective action.
In one instance (as of October 24, 2002), the violation was, in fact, referred to a federal survey team for treatment as a complaint.
Quality Indicator Study
The OHCQ examined quality indicators (QIs) for contractures, restraints, and pressure sores for all facilities, and identified 165 nursing homes that had one or more rates that were significantly higher than the state and national averages.
Each home was notified in April 2001 and asked to review the quality indicator data and, if appropriate, develop an improvement plan.
They were also asked to determine a reasonable decrease in the rate that could be anticipated for calendar year 2001, and to submit the plan and projected improvement to OHCQ.
The Second Survey team has incorporated the review of these plans into their protocols.
A review of the data after one year indicated significant reductions in all three areas for those nursing homes that were asked to participate in the study.
Best Practices/Training
The state sponsors joint training with surveyors and facility staff.
The most recent training program, held in February 2002, was called "Enhancing Quality: Initiatives, Strategies, and Solutions."
For this training, facilities were taught how to identify quality problems and how to improve quality.
Since the February workshop, two additional follow-up sessions were held that focused on sharing individual QI successes and/or failures.
The Office of Health Care Quality also accepts grant proposals to implement innovative ideas or to conduct research that will improve the quality of care for nursing home residents.
Grants are funded by Civil Money Penalty funds.
Clinical Alerts
The Office of Health Care Quality Clinical Alerts Newsletter for licensed providers, first published in December 2001, focuses on problems that the OHCQ has identified through its regulatory activities.
OHCQ expects to publish the newsletter four to six times per year and to devote each issue to clinical topics that may pose problems in health care facilities across the state, providing information and references that will help in the day-to-day care of patients.
The first "Clinical Observations and Notes" newsletter covers the topics of anticoagulation, the flu season, and physician notification.
The Newsletter is available on-line at the OHCQ website.
The second issue discussed end-of-life care, specifically requirements of a nursing home to follow advanced directives.
Copies of these newsletters are included in Appendix D.
Wellspring Project
This is a collaborative project with the Mid-Atlantic Non-Profit Health and Housing Association (MANPHA) that focuses on increasing the use of clinical practice guidelines, sharing of best practices and empowerment of nursing assistants.
To date, there have been training sessions and conferences, and facilities have expressed an interest.
Funding was approved in September 2002 and the project, with ten facilities participating, will begin in January 2003.
Pets on Wheels
This is an evaluation of the extremely popular Pets on Wheels program.
It is designed to provide quantitative data on the positive impact of pets in the nursing home environment on the quality of life.
OHCQ has supplied funding ($51,000) from the Civil Money Penalty Account to do a literature review and conduct resident satisfaction surveys with pet programs in Maryland homes.
Results of this evaluation are anticipated in early January 2003.
Family Council Project
This collaborative project with the National Citizens' Coalition for Nursing Home Reform (NCCNHR) is funded by a grant from OHCQ and aimed at improving knowledge and interaction between families and nursing home management.
It encourages family run Family Councils through training of staff and families, newsletters and video.
In Phase 1, NCCNHR initiated a quarterly newsletter for families and sponsored training workshops for family members and social workers covering topics such as the regulations applying to family councils, promoting participation, establishing family council structure and developing leadership, family council advocacy and communication, and overcoming obstacles to family council development.
NCCNHR also conducted a survey of family members, ombudsmen, and nursing home facility personnel in Maryland to gather information about their experience working with family councils.
Plans for Phase 2 include extending the work of the family council project and producing a video on family councils for use by family members, ombudsmen and nursing home staff.
Project staff will produce the video, offer training at facilities around the state, sponsor workshops on forming and strengthening family councils, and start a website for family councils in Maryland.
Decubitus Ulcer Project
OHCQ is working with nursing homes and hospitals to ensure preventive measures for decubitus ulcers, particularly when residents are transferred between nursing homes and hospitals.
Plans include a quality assurance seminar, with facilities developing their own QA plan and follow-up taking place in three to six months, along with recognition for improvements.
Maryland's Nursing Home Performance Evaluation Guide
Maryland also established one of the first state public reporting tools.
In 1999, the Maryland General Assembly established the Maryland Health Care Commission (MHCC) to carry out several health care reforms in the state, including development of information on nursing home quality.
The MHCC worked with the Department of Health and Mental Hygiene and the Department of Aging, experts in long-term care, representatives of the nursing home industry in Maryland, as well as nursing home advocates and long-term care ombudsmen to produce the Nursing Home Performance Evaluation Guide.
There are several ways to search for information about nursing homes in the Guide, including by name, by location, and by characteristics such as size, ownership and specialty care offered.
Once a facility is selected, the user can view facility characteristics (e.g., profit status, number of beds, specialty units); resident characteristics (e.g.; gender, age and functional status); and quality ratings based on the CHSRA MDS-based Quality Indicators (QIs).
The QIs are grouped into the four sub-categories of clinical, functional, psychosocial and medication-prescribing care with ratings given for 21 measures.
The quality ratings are represented by filled, empty, and half-filled circles.
A full circle is utilized for a facility's QI that is at or below the 20^th percentile (fewer adverse events), an empty circle for QIs that are at or above the 90^th percentile (more adverse events), and a half-filled circle for the middle 70%.
Drilling down in each facility's sub-category score allows the user to view the state-wide range of ratings among all facilities for each of the QIs.
The Guide also contains information on inspection survey history including the type, scope and severity of deficiencies noted.
Information on interpreting and using the data is also presented, as well as a Consumer's Nursing Home Checklist and advice on how to pay for nursing home care.
The Performance Evaluation Guide is available on-line at www.mhcc.state.md.us/nhguide.
A sample performance report is included in Appendix C.
Aspects of QIPs that were Noted to Work Well
Both the QA Plan requirement and the Second Survey were noted by those we spoke with to be positive aspects of the Maryland quality initiatives.
Comments regarding the QA Plan were that a requirement that "formalized" quality assurance was good, and encouraged providers to look at whether they had a comprehensive enough approach.
One provider stated that the "formalized approach" to QA makes them stay attuned to issues, in a way they may not without a formal requirement.
A facility representative believed that the requirement to meet and review QA activities monthly is positive because it "makes the QA program more meaningful" and helped to give nursing home administrators and management a better understanding of quality issues.
Another provider stated that having the quality improvement programs as a focus allows facility nurses to feel empowered, and gives them the perspective that they can have an effect on their environment.
This is a great enhancement over the former feeling that the best they could do in terms of performance was score a "zero" on their number of deficiency citations.
Finally, the Ombudsmen stated that the process of the facility sitting down and talking with the medical director and each other during the QA meeting has had a very positive effect, and that the QA requirement has made facilities more aware and more accountable.
The Second Survey was seen as a positive aspect of Maryland's quality improvement initiatives.
HFAM believes the second survey program is a positive change, and the sharing of best practice information is positive.
One facility reported that the second survey was a welcome relief after the state LTC certification survey ("during certification surveys we were grilled, exhausted and I felt kicked").
This group stated that it is a relief to be able to have an open dialogue about problems and issues in resident care, and to obtain advise and feedback.
Although there was initially a great deal of suspicion, those we spoke with stated that the Second Survey has changed the relationship between the State and providers and has enabled providers to identify problems and implement corrections.
Other general comments regarding what seems to work well in Maryland had to do with the use of quality indicators in the second survey and in other quality initiatives, and the more positive relationship between the state and the provider community.
HFAM noted that the new focus on quality indicators and quality improvement was a good outcome of the QA requirements, and that the focus no longer revolves simply around deficiencies.
The Ombudsmen stated that the relationship between the state and providers had improved since the implementation of the quality improvement initiatives.
OHCQ is perceived as having attempted to make the survey process less adversarial.
Ombudsmen report fewer complaints from facilities about the LTC certification surveys than previously.
Additional positive observations made by providers included the following: * the QIs help facilities identify MDS coding problems; * facilities need health information systems to more efficiently use MDS data for quality improvement; * the monthly QA meetings provide facilities the opportunity to track the effect of quality improvement efforts; and * quality improvement programs most benefit smaller facilities that have more limited resources; larger facilities can invest in many innovative approaches.
Aspects of QIPs that were Noted to be Less Successful
The central themes regarding aspects of the Maryland quality initiatives that were less successful were around communication of quality initiatives with the Ombudsman, provider access to funding, and the minimum staffing requirement.
With the exception of one person we spoke with (a supervisor), Ombudsman were not at all familiar with the Second Survey, and wished that they were more informed about this.
In general, ombudsmen were unaware of or at least personally unfamiliar with two other initiatives: the clinical alerts and the decubitus ulcer project.
They also objected to facilities' inconsistent approach to communicating with them regarding QA meetings and QA activities.
All received different levels of communication from their facilities regarding the QA meetings, some inconsistently received meeting minutes, and all wished to be kept abreast of QA activities on a regular basis.
HFAM believes that the health quality account could be more accessible (argues that state has $2 million in CMP monies that they should be able to access for QIPs).
Lifespan agreed that more money needed to be made available for quality improvement projects such as WellSpring (Lifespan has applied for grant money from state, but still awaiting approval and funding).
In terms of the staffing requirements, two main areas of program weakness were noted.
Ombudsman stated that--despite the facilities' seeming compliance with the posting of staff mandate--facilities often post the number of staff that were on the schedule, not necessarily those that actually reported for work or are actually working on that particular unit.
Also some facilities posted the information, but not always in a visible location.
This can be confusing for family members.
With regard to the minimum staffing requirement, most providers we spoke to believe this requirement to be unnecessary, as the levels required were described as "the bare minimum" and claimed that most facilities staff well above those minimums.
One comment was made regarding potential improvements to the Quality Indicator Study.
The state reported that many nursing facilities had unrealistic expectations regarding their expected performance on quality indicators.
For example, some facilities may have set goals to have a zero percent QI rate, rather than simply attempting to decrease the rate by a certain percentage.
Improved understanding of this issue will be required in order to assist providers in attaining quality improvement goals.
The state has begun to conduct an evaluation of this program by looking at baseline data and follow up rates of the three targeted quality indicators.
Another comment was made about the medical director requirement, which was that medical directors are concerned that they do not have enough time to fulfill their responsibilities.
For this reason, some questioned the ability of this regulation to have any impact.
Impact of QIPs on Quality of Care and Quality of Life
Aspects of the QA Plan requirement were seen as having a positive impact on quality of care, and one HFAM representative believed that - though it's too soon to tell if the Medical Director requirements will have an affect on quality--this requirement has the potential to have a positive effect.
Those who believed that quality of care were positively influenced by the QA requirement made the following observations: * since the requirement calls for more management to be involved in daily operations, there should be a positive impact on resident outcomes (OHCQ staff); * improved or increased interactions between nurses and nursing assistants and between nursing assistants and residents should result in better resident outcomes (OHCQ staff); * the requirement for a social worker to attend the QA meetings improves quality of care and quality of life for residents (from a facility social worker); and * the second survey and QA Plan "couldn't but help" quality of care for residents (Lifespan).
HFAM stated that the regulations may have merely "fine-tuned" programs already in place intended to enhance quality.
Providers believe that the focus on quality improvement and QIs, combined with the Second Survey, has actually worked to improve quality.
A potential negative impact on resident quality of life was cited by the Ombudsmen as being attributable to the QA requirements.
Some facilities have reportedly initiated "Grand body rounds" or "full body checks" in response to need for QA and daily monitoring.
This process involves a team (of three staff) rounding on all patients and inspecting their skin (at times including genitalia).
The Ombudsmen consider this a violation of patient rights and of privacy, and believe that facilities have begun the practice in response to the QA requirements.
While perceived to have a positive effect, the true effectiveness of the Maryland quality improvement initiatives has not yet been measured.
The next phase, per the state, is to evaluate the effectiveness of the programs.
According to OHCQ, the eventual evaluation will look at complaint rates, correlations between deficiency citations and areas targeted for facility quality improvement, and facility satisfaction with the Second Survey.
Sustainability and Lessons Learned
There was no discussion among those we spoke to of any of the nursing home reform legislation being repealed, or any quality initiatives being at risk of termination due to budget cuts or other reasons.
This lack of discussion or concern, combined with a generally positive attitude among the provider community about the quality initiatives, indicate that most Maryland QIPs appear quite sustainable.
Carol Benner reported that most programs are of cost to providers (vs. the state), and that the Second Survey is likely to continue.
"The Second Survey people are protected...they aren't federally funded...".
There were many lessons learned cited by the state staff, and a couple of comments made regarding how the quality initiatives could have been better implemented.
A provider stated that the state could have moved more slowly in implementing regulations, as facilities were not adequately prepared for newly required QA activities.
General lessons learned by OHCQ staff in Maryland include: * States need to have creative ways to look for balance between punitive and non-punitive programs.
* It is important to obtain industry (and legislative) buy-in.
According to Carol Benner, "A lot of the program success is attributable to public relations--getting your ideas out there and promoting them".
* States should disclose their goals and be very upfront with facilities when launching such programs.
* States should take a multi-faceted approach, since it's unclear what exactly works in improving nursing home quality.
* States should conduct intensive training for program staffs on newly enacted regulations before implementation (surveyors thought Maryland might have done this better).
* States should take the time to study other quality improvement models, as Maryland did, prior to designing and implementing any new programs.
Program-specific comments had to do with the Medical Director requirement and the implementation of the Second Survey.
In terms of the Medical Director requirement, the state reported that, if they had to do this all again, they probably would have engaged in more collaboration with the industry and physician groups to get buy-in from these groups before the Medical Director regulation went into effect.
They would, however, advise other states to follow their lead and pass strong regulations to make physicians accountable.
Lessons learned regarding the Second Survey included that, since a process like this is a dramatic departure from the usual "surveyor" mindset, the personality of the technical assistance surveyors is the key to success.
The surveyors themselves commented that it is very important early in implementation to assure that everyone involved in the program "be on the same page."
They found that, early on in the process, they were not always consistent in their message to facilities.
This has improved over time, but could have been dealt with more effectively by more thorough communication.
The Second Survey is evolving with time and as lessons are learned by the surveyors.
For example, a standardized tool has been developed for the Second Survey that examines the facility's ability to internally monitor falls, malnutrition and dehydration, pressure ulcers, medication administration, accidents and injuries, changes in physical/mental status, quality indicators, and other important aspects of care.
At the time of our visit, all nursing homes had been surveyed once and baseline data had been collected.
The Technical Assistance Unit is in the process of reviewing lessons learned from the first year and establishing the focus for the second round of surveys.
Potential Role of the Federal Government in Quality Improvement and Barriers to Quality Imposed by the Federal Government
Comments on the role of the Federal Government in promoting quality improvement were quite limited.
One facility administrator stated that she saw the Federal Government's role focused on data collection, but that the states should be taking the lead on quality improvement programs.
The corporate vice president for clinical services stated that she wasn't certain exactly what the role of the Federal Government should be, but that their involvement was critical, primarily because of their responsibility for funding.
She noted several possible areas for the Federal Government involvement--data management, producing national trends, and disseminating best practices.
She felt that an effort to maximize the utility and applicability of the data to multiple agencies and organizations was important.
Summary/Conclusions
The project team was impressed with the level of support that most QIPs received from the various providers that participated in our discussions.
The general attitude expressed was that most of the QIPs introduced in the Nursing Home Reform package were feasible, appropriately directed, and able to be implemented by most (if not all) nursing facilities.
Some areas for improvement were noted, of course, but by and large those we spoke to were supportive of the programs.
Areas noted for improvement were an increase in communication about QIPs between OHCQ and the Ombudsmen and between facilities and the Ombudsmen, and a greater degree of accessibility among providers to special funds for quality improvement projects.
This is not to say that all nursing facility representatives with whom we met in Maryland believed strongly in the ability of the programs to improve resident outcomes.
To the contrary, providers were skeptical that these QIPs were sufficient to solve the quality of care problem in nursing homes.
They named issues of staffing and of the long-term care survey and certification process as barriers to high quality performance.
Providers attributed the biggest problems to promoting or increasing nursing home quality to: * Nursing staff turnover and the nursing shortage; * Mid-level nursing staff lacking critical management skills; and * The pervasive use of contract nursing staff.
Provider representatives met with also stated that the long-term care survey and certification requirements must be changed, as the process and penalties are so severe that it is impossible for facilities to ever feel positive about performance when the best result that can stem from the long-term care survey is a "zero" deficiency.
Another opinion expressed in general about the quality initiatives was with regard to quality indicators used for measuring facility performance.
The opinion was expressed that quality indicators should focus on positive outcomes, rather than just on negative measures.
An example of a positive indicator of quality cited was the number of hours the Medical Director is in the facility.
From this project's point of view, it is difficult to say with certainty what will work in Maryland and what may not work to improve nursing home quality.
There are a multitude of initiatives underway, all enacted during the same timeframe, all enacted in a climate of decreases in nurse staffing and other changes affecting the nursing home industry (e.g., declines in occupancy, Medicare skilled nursing facility prospective payment, public reporting MDS-based quality indicators).
No formal evaluation is currently underway to examine the affect of any of these programs on resident outcomes.
Such an evaluation would assist the state in refining and improving upon the current set of quality initiatives.
References
AHCA.
State Summaries of Nursing Facilities, 2001.
www.ahca.org/research/keynotes/statefactsheets-2001.pdf.
Time Magazine.
Fatal Neglect: In possible thousands of cases, nursing home residents are dying from a lack of food and water and the most basic level of hygiene.
October 27, 1997.
U.S.
General Accounting Office.
California Nursing Homes: Care Problems Persist Despite Federal and State Oversight.
HEHS-98-202.
July 27, 1998.
U.S.
General Accounting Office.
Nursing Homes: Stronger Complaint and Enforcement Practices Needed to Better Ensure Adequate Care.
T-HEHS-99-89.
March 22, 1999.
MISSOURI
Overview of the Missouri Visit
Missouri was selected for a state site visit because of the project team's interest in the quality improvement projects that have been implemented in the state by Marilyn Rantz and her colleagues at the University of Missouri-Columbia Sinclair School of Nursing.
They have developed and implemented the following quality improvement programs in the state: the Missouri "Show-Me Quality Indicator Report" (implemented in 1999), the Quality Improvement Program for Missouri (QIPMO) (pilot tested in 1999 and implemented in 2000), a staff education program for the state's surveyors (which started in the early 1990s), a support group for MDS coordinators (which started in 2001), and a nursing home staff education program (which started in 1997).
They think of these as various components of a single quality improvement effort rather than separate programs.
Missouri is the only state with this type of partnership between the state survey agency and a university.
The QIPMO program includes on-site technical assistance, educational programs and support groups for facility staff and an educational component for survey agency staff.
A Best Practices program is also funded by the state and run by Central Missouri University.
Participants
Abt staff members Alan White and Donna Hurd spent three days in Jefferson City and Columbia, Missouri in July 2002, meeting with state survey agency staff, ombudsman, provider association staff and members, state Quality Improvement Organization (QIO) staff, QIPMO nurses and developer Marilyn Rantz as well as facility staff who had participated in QIPMO visits.
Researchers were also allowed to accompany QIPMO nurses on a site visit to observe the TA visit in progress.
The following individuals agreed to participate in discussions with the researchers: * Missouri Department of Health and Senior Services/Division of Health Standards and Licensure, Section for Long-Term Care Regulation + David Morgan, Manager + Lois Kollmeyer RN, Director + Darrell Hendrickson, Deputy Division Director + Betty Markway RN MSN, State MDS Coordinator
* Missouri Department of Health and Senior Services, Senior Services and Regulations, State Office of Long-Term Care + Carol Scott, State Ombudsman
* Missouri Association of Health Care (AHCA Affiliate) + Marlene Anderson + Terri Lueckenotte, Administrator, Capital Healthcare Center + David Duncan, President, Tiffany Care Centers, Inc.
+ Tim Francka, Administrative Director of Long Term Care Facilities, Citizens Memorial Healthcare
* Missouri Association of Homes for the Aging (AHSA Affiliate) + Denise Clemonds, Executive Director + Patricia Kapsar, Vice President and Corporate Compliance Officer, Bethesda Health Group, Inc.
* University of Missouri-Columbia, Sinclair School of Nursing + Marilyn Rantz, Ph.D, RN, NHA, FAAN + Any Vogelsmeier, MSN, RN, CS, GCNS + De Minner, RN + Steven Miller, Program Coordinator
* Not-For-Profit Facility--122 Beds + Administrator + Director of Nursing
* Not-For-Profit Facility--120 Beds + Assistant Director of Nursing + Charge Nurses + Physical Therapist + Director of Nursing + Administrator
* Missouri Quality Improvement Organization + Catherine Gill, MS, PT, MHA, Director, Nursing Home and Home Health Services + Carolyn Spradlin RN, BSN, Quality Specialist, Nursing Home and Home Health Services + Deborah Finley, Director, Communications and Beneficiary Outreach Services + Carol Beahan, Communication Specialist
Marilyn Rantz and her colleagues at the University of Missouri-Columbia Sinclair School of Nursing were our primary contacts for the Missouri site visit.
Dr. Rantz was very generous with her time providing information on state politics, history, development and implementation of the various components of the program both prior to our visit and while we were there.
The two QIPMO nurses with whom we met, Amy Vogelsmeir and De Minner were extremely helpful in explaining and demonstrating their role in the program as well as the program's philosophy and in arranging for us to accompany them on a visit.
Everyone that we contacted prior to our arrival was open to participating in discussions.
Both provider associations invited members in to their office for meetings.
Initially, the executive director of the AHCA affiliate had responded that he did not believe that many of his member facilities had participated in the QIPMO program.
When assured that the research team was also interested in the reasons that facilities may have chosen not to participate, he was fully cooperative and invited member facilities to be present for our meeting.
Interestingly, he was not able to be at the meeting as he was testifying in a lawsuit brought by the association against the governor over nursing home reimbursement.
Our contact at the state survey agency included his immediate supervisors in our meetings as well as the individual who had had the most contact with the QIPMO nurses.
The Missouri QIO director of nursing home activities contacted us prior to our site visit and requested that in addition to a scheduled meeting with her and members of her staff that she be allowed to sit in on visits with other groups as she too was gathering information on the QIPMO program in conjunction with their work for CMS on the Nursing Home Quality Initiative.
Preparation
Prior to the on-site visit, factual information on the quality improvement program was gathered from a literature review, stakeholder discussions and Missouri DHHS and University web sites.
Information on the following aspects of the programs was gathered and organized in a table: * Program title; * Program description; * Agency contact--the person(s) most knowledgeable about the program protocols and implementation to date; * Impetus--what prompted the development of the program; * Designer--identify the individual(s) or group(s) responsible for program design and indicate agency affiliation(s); * Goals--state the program objectives; * Funding Source and Amount--state current funding amounts/sources and projections for future periods; * Program Staff--indicate how many individuals are involved in the program implementation including administrative support, what is the organizational structure; * Facility Involvement--is this a requirement for all facilities or a voluntary program, how are facilities selected for inclusion, if voluntary? * Dates--what are the program beginning and end dates; * Evaluation--indicate current and planned formal evaluation program(s).
The table was forwarded to Marilyn Rantz prior to the on-site visit for her to review and provide additional or corrected information.
The research team used the factual information in the table as a starting point to develop discussion questions that focused on more in-depth issues.
Letters of endorsement explaining the project goals, state selection and discussion processes were formulated and sent to prospective participants.
In response to a request by the AHCA affiliate, letters of invitation to participate in group discussions were written and forwarded to the provider associations for use with their members.
Follow-up phone calls were made to arrange for convenient dates and times for meetings.
Structure
Meetings with the survey agency staff, provider association staff and members, ombudsman, university, state QIO and nursing facility staff took place at their respective offices or on-site at the nursing facility and generally lasted one to two hours.
The research team met with the QIPMO nurses at an off-site location and then accompanied them to the nursing facility to observe the technical assistance visit.
Discussions were generally loosely structured with researchers presenting both prepared and spontaneous questions and recording participants' responses in writing.
A Brief Description of Missouri's Nursing Home Industry
In order to compare Missouri's nursing home industry with the other study states, we present some descriptive characteristics.
There are 552 facilities in Missouri (AHCA web site) with 38,671 residents reported as of Spring 2001.
The average number of beds per facility is 99, which is slightly lower than the national average of 108.
Missouri's average occupancy rate for its nursing homes (80 percent) is one of the lowest in the nation as reported by the Missouri auditor (2001).
The median occupancy rate per facility is 75.9 percent as compared to the national rate of 95.1 percent.
The percentage of for profit and not for profit homes in Missouri is very close to the national averages with 67 percent of Missouri homes operating for profit (vs. 65 percent national average) and 24 percent as non-profit homes (vs. 28 percent national average).
There are slightly more homes government operated (9 percent vs. 7 percent).
The state has a below-average percentage of chain-affiliated facilities (48 percent vs. the national average of 55 percent).
Twelve percent of the state's nursing facilities are hospital-based, which is the same as the national average.
The majority of homes are dually certified for Medicare and Medicaid (75 percent) as compared to the national average of 80 percent.
Impetus for Missouri's Quality Improvement Programs
The QIPMO programs originated from the vision of Marilyn Rantz and supporters at the Division of Aging.
Dr. Rantz holds a Ph.D. in Nursing from the University of Wisconsin-Milwaukee, Masters of Science in Nursing from Marquette University, and Master of Arts in Teaching from the University of Wisconsin-Whitewater.
She has also been a nursing home administrator.
While at Wisconsin, she worked under David Zimmerman and provided clinical input to the development of the CHSRA quality indicators.
Dr. Rantz was interested in using MDS data to track nursing home quality and came to the University of Missouri because she would have access to MDS data.
Dr. Rantz worked with Paul Shumate, who was then the Director of Long-Term Care Regulation to introduce quality improvement programs.
He was interested in seeing that the MDS data be used and improved.
She began in 1993 to put the research team together.
A statute establishing the Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund was introduced in 1994 and made effective in 1995.
According to a staff member at the Missouri QIO who had been employed in the survey agency for over 20 years, at the time the Quality of Care Fund was introduced, there had been a great deal of tension between facilities and the Division of Aging.
The proposal was introduced as a way to use the nursing home fines to fund quality improvement programs--a way to utilize the fines to prevent future fines.
The survey agency accepted the proposition because it provided some assistance for facilities in a manner that did not compromise their role in regulatory enforcement.
The statue required that any activities funded under this statute had to be approved by both provider associations.
In 1999, the University ran the pilot study testing the impact of using advanced practice nurses to provide technical assistance to nursing facilities.
When the pilot demonstrated that on-going on-site visits were effective in improving resident outcomes, Paul Shumate wanted to expand the program to include all nursing facilities.
Around the same time, the state auditor reported that the state was behind on their surveys.
Missouri requires an annual certification and licensure survey as well as a briefer interim survey.
The AHCA affiliate director did not believe that facilities would accept QIPMO visits without some sort of incentive.
He promoted the idea of using the QIPMO visit as the interim survey.
As Dr. Rantz explained, she was not in favor of this, as she believed the focus of QIPMO visits should be on quality and did not like being this closely linked to the survey process.
Resident advocates feared that the change would weaken enforcement mechanisms.
Ombudsman and resident advocates agreed with Dr. Rantz on this.
However, in an effort to get the program implemented, she went along with the proposal hoping that the process could later be revised.
Linkage to the interim survey lasted only about six months--a regulation was passed requiring that all surveys be unannounced and because QIPMO visits were scheduled in advance with facilities, QIPMO visits could no longer take the place of interim surveys.
Recent changes in the organization of the Division of Aging also appear to have had at least some indirect effect on quality improvement programs.
During Governor Carnahan's tenure, there had been an attempt to pass a constitutional amendment to create a separate Department of Aging.
This was defeated however, in a statewide referendum.
After Carnahan's death in October 2000, the acting governor moved the Division of Aging to the Department of Health and Senior Services by means of an executive order.
The intent was to focus more attention on aging issues by moving it into a smaller department (the Department of Social Services had at the time over 10,000 employees).
According to informants, the move took approximately one year to organize and had just recently been completed.
As part of the transition, the Institutional Services Section of the former Division of Aging became the Section for Long Term Care Regulation under the Division of Health Standards and Licensure within the Department of Health and Senior Services.
During our discussions with stakeholders, and in subsequent correspondence with state survey agency personnel, we received differing opinions of the effect of the reorganization.
According to some we spoke to, during the reorganization, there has been significant turnover and staff changes at both the surveyor and management levels, with a resultant loss of much "history" and institutional knowledge, particularly related to QIPMO.
David Morgan, Manager of the state's Section for Long-Term Care Regulation, stated that there has not been a great deal of turnover in response to the reorganization.
He also notes that the changes that have occurred have given the agency "new perspectives that may find other issues with programs prior staff were blind to."
Concern was also voiced that changes that have occurred as a result of the reorganization have strained the ability of the Section for Long Term Care Regulation to operate effectively, and that the agency is not able to target poorly performing facilities as aggressively as it had previously.
However, recent audits have identified several areas of improvement in the management and performance of the state's survey agency.
The number of facilities receiving notices of non-compliance has remained stable, and it is not clear whether the reorganization has impacted the effectiveness of the state's survey and certification activities.
Regardless of whether the organizational changes have been beneficial or deleterious overall, many stakeholders expressed the concern that the changes, coupled with the state's budget crisis and the new nursing home quality initiatives launched by the state's QIO, have created a tenuous situation for continued QIPMO funding.
Dr. Rantz was able to use her analyses of the effectiveness of QIPMO to secure funding for this year, convincing the state that the program is effective in improving nursing home quality and a prudent funding choice in an atmosphere of competing agency needs.
Overall Intent/Vision for Missouri's Quality Improvement Programs
Marilyn Rantz states that the guiding principle of QIPMO is that "things can be done differently."
She explains that much of the care provided in nursing homes is routine and is provided the way it is simply because "it's always been done that way."
The QIPMO nurses challenge facilities to think about care planning differently and to make changes in how care is provided to improve quality of care.
The program is focused on raising standards of care for the elderly by helping the facility to identify and solve their care problems.
QIPMO nurses use the quality indicator reports for quality improvement, not survey improvement.
The survey process is focused on meeting minimum regulatory standards, but QIPMO is focused on best practices and applying the current care guidelines to achieve something beyond minimal outcomes.
Dr. Rantz believes that if standard care practices are met, it is likely that the facility will not have problems with the survey process.
Quality Improvement Principles and QIPMO
As we compare the various state programs, the research team determined that it would be useful to identify a standard for quality improvement that could be applied to the various state programs as a means by which to compare them.
The following key principle and framework for quality improvement as described by Dr. M. Rashad Massoud was identified as such a standard.
Dr. Massoud describes the following concepts: * Fundamental principle of improvement--Systems need to change in order to achieve higher levels of performance.
Quality improvement activity involves the examination of the various processes involved in the activity to determine any potential areas for change that may yield improvement.
* Principles of Quality Management--There are four main principles of quality improvement: + Focus on the client + Understanding work as systems and processes + Teamwork + Focus on the use of data
As stated above, Dr. Rantz explained her vision for QIPMO as a program that would encourage nursing facility staff to look at the processes they currently use in a critical manner eliminating the standard, "this is the way we've always done it" approach.
Her vision is very similar to Massoud's description of a fundamental principle for improvement.
QIPMO focuses on data, as noted above and is highly focused on the needs of the client.
Each facility visit agenda is determined by the particular needs of the nursing facility staff.
QIPMO nurses work as a team, relying on each other's areas of expertise.
They begin by attempting to understand the facility's systems for MDS completion as a first step to determining the accuracy of the data.
Massoud also describes a methodology for quality improvement, PDSA (Plan, Study, Do and Act) also referred to Shewhart's Cycle for Learning and Improvement.
The QIPMO program was developed via this process as described above and the activities carried out by the QIPMO nurses in the nursing facilities also follow this standard process.
Facility staff are encouraged to collect the baseline data from their "Show-Me" reports, work with the QIPMO nurses to determine the validity of the report and then develop a plan to change their care processes.
They implement the change, monitor the results, study the effect as reported in subsequent "Show-Me" reports and either continue the change or modify it to achieve the desired results.
Description of Quality Improvement Programs in Missouri
The Missouri Quality Improvement Program for Missouri (QIPMO) is an on-site clinical consultation program intended to assist nursing homes with their quality improvement programs.
There are several distinctive features of the QIPMO program: * Nursing facility participation in the program is voluntary.
Facilities self-select to have a QIPMO visit by contacting the QIPMO coordinator at the University of Missouri.
In 2000 there were 459 QIPMO visits made to 212 nursing facilities.
Through July 10, 345 site visits to 163 different facilities had been conducted.
(There are about 600 nursing homes in Missouri, and about 45 percent of these have participated in the program).
* The program operates separately from the state survey agency.
QIPMO is a state-funded program, but the State's Long-Term Care Regulation department has virtually nothing to do with the day-to-day operation of the program, and provides only broad oversight of it (e.g., summary reports of QIPMO nurse activity).
Missouri is the only state that operates its technical assistance program through a university.
* QIPMO is entirely separate from the state survey and enforcement process.
Unlike other states with technical assistance programs, QIPMO nurses are not surveyors and they have no training in the survey process.
Instead, they are gerontological clinical nurse specialists.
QIPMO visits are confidential (except in the rare cases where cases of immediate jeopardy or actual harm to residents are encountered).
No details about QIPMO visits are reported to the survey agency (not even which facilities were visited).
QIPMO nurses do not answer regulatory questions.
They do not interpret regulations.
Their focus is on best practices, evidence-based practice, and standards of care.
This separation lets surveyors focus on regulation, while QIPMO focuses on quality of care.
* QIPMO makes much greater use of the MDS quality indicators than do other states.
The same researchers who developed QIPMO also developed the Missouri "Show-Me Quality Indicator Report," which helps facilities track trends in quality indicators derived from the MDS.
A major focus of QIPMO is helping facilities to understand the "Show Me" reports and help them use the quality indicators to develop or refine their quality improvement program.
Some QIPMO visits are focused on MDS coding issues, since these contribute to facility quality indicator scores.
* The QIPMO program is research-based.
The design of QIPMO was influenced by the results of a randomized clinical trial that was conducted in 1999.
In this trial, facilities were assigned to one of three groups (facilities that received workshop and feedback reports only, facilities that also received clinical consultation, and a control group.)
This research showed that on-going on-site clinical consultation is effective in influencing change in nursing care that affects resident outcomes.
This research was the foundation for QIPMO and the "Show Me" reports.
* The effectiveness of QIPMO has been studied in-depth.
Dr. Rantz and her colleagues have studied the impact of QIPMO on CHRSA quality indicators in the state.
Since the implementation of QIPMO, there have been improvements in 16 quality indicators and a decline in only six measures.
In addition to analyzing median quality indicator scores, the research team analyzes trends for the 90^th and 95^th percentile, so that the effectiveness of the program in improving outcomes for low-quality facilities can be understood.
The QIPMO program includes several integral components: * Computerization of State Specific Reports using MDS Data--the "Show-Me Quality Indicator Reports" * On-Site Clinical Consultation Visits * Standardization of MDS Education * Monthly Support groups for MDS coordinators * Surveyor Training, Provider Meeting Participation and other Educational Programming on clinical topics of importance to resident care
The state also has a Best Practices program administered through the Central Missouri State University.
"Show-Me" Quality Indicator Reports
Electronic longitudinal "Show-Me" Quality Indicator Reports are compiled each quarter and available on-line via the statewide computer network for all nursing facilities in the state.
These reports show how each facility is performing over the past five quarters for each CHSRA quality indicator in comparison to statewide tenth percentile thresholds.
The reports were developed by Marilyn Rantz and colleagues and are used by the QIPMO nurses to structure and guide the on-site technical assistance visit.
The "Show-Me" Quality Indicator Report consists of the CHSRA quality indicator trend graphs and summary tables, displayed one indicator per page, along with a resident roster listing each resident with the quality indicator(s) that they trigger.
The summary table contains by quarter, the facility's QI score, number of residents with the QI, number of residents included in the calculation, number of residents not in the calculation, the applicable MDS items and the statewide summary.
Statewide summary includes the tenth percentile score and the facility's ranking in Missouri.
Each page also includes a definition of the indicator and explanation of the upper and lower thresholds.
Appendix B contains a sample "Show Me" report.
On-Site Clinical Consultation Visits
Beginning in mid-2000, specially trained QIPMO nurses have conducted technical assistance visits at nursing facilities, residential and intermediate care facilities.
These visits are voluntary, consultative, confidential and intended to assist nursing homes with their quality improvement programs.
The technical assistance component to QIPMO was pilot tested with 113 facilities in 1999.
Results of the pilot indicated that on-going on-site clinical consultation by an advanced practice nurse was effective in improving care and outcomes for residents in nursing facilities.
Each visit is facility-specific and begins with a review of the facility's "Show-Me" Quality Indicator Reports.
After an understanding of the QI definitions and reports is achieved, QIPMO visits often result in the identification of specific clinical indicators that may need further review.
Facility staff are guided through the process to determine whether the QI result is an accurate representation of their residents, beginning with a check of the accuracy of the MDS item coding and progressing to a review of facility care processes in terms of their ability to meet accepted clinical standards.
Using the resident roster generated as part of the "Show-Me" reports, QIPMO nurses use actual facility residents to focus discussion on MDS accuracy and resident-specific care processes.
There is no charge associated with the visit.
In the course of a QIPMO visit, depending on the needs of the facility, the clinical team may conduct group discussions with members of the nursing care team including nursing assistants, observe care processes, review medical records and provide in-service programs on a variety of MDS-and clinical care-related topics.
Standardization of MDS Education
Recognizing that accurate QI reports would provide the foundation for quality improvement efforts and that accurate MDS assessment data was critical to valid QI reports, University of Missouri faculty partnered with the Missouri Division of Aging to convene a group of industry representatives to guide the on-going state needs for staff education on the MDS.
The group included representatives from the Missouri Health Care Association, the Missouri Hospital Association, the Missouri Association for Homes and Services for the Aging and the Missouri League of Nursing Home Administrators.
Their goal was to provide consistent and accurate information on the MDS and use the MDS data for quality improvement.
The group began meeting in March 1997 and continues to meet on a quarterly basis.
In the first year, they developed standardized educational materials on the MDS which are currently required to be used by any individual or organization providing MDS education in the state.
Training materials consist of an "Item-by-Item Guide to the MDS" and a "Case Study: Mrs. M."
The Item-By-Item Guide is a reference for correct coding and definitions of MDS items.
The Case Study is used for teaching the Resident Assessment Protocols and care planning.
They are intended for use with the interdisciplinary team and not just for nursing staff.
Workshops are provided several times a year at varied locations throughout the state.
Monthly Support Groups for MDS Coordinators
As they conducted their technical assistance visits, QIPMO nurses became increasingly aware of the high turnover of MDS Coordinators.
Believing that the turnover was related to a lack of resources, a lack of support, lack of understanding of their role by administrative staff and co-workers and feelings of stress in their positions, the QIPMO nurses initiated monthly support group meetings in May 2000 in the St. Louis area.
Since then, monthly meetings have expanded to the seven geographic regions of the state covered by the seven QIPMO nurses.
The support group goals include: (1) Improve MDS coding accuracy, (2) Enhance job satisfaction for MDS Coordinators, and (3) Increase overall staff retention rates.
Meetings are facilitated by QIPMO nurses and are held at volunteer facilities in each region.
There is no charge for the meeting, with expenses for mailings covered by the host facility.
QIPMO nurses schedule the meetings, select topics or speakers and serve as resources.
Meeting formats vary based on the interests and concerns of the group, and problem solving occurs collaboratively.
The state regulatory agency, particularly the state MDS coordinator, has been supportive of the group and has visited each region to give the participants the opportunity to ask questions.
State technical support staff have also attended meetings, as have regional surveyors.
Surveyor Training, Provider Meeting Participation and other Educational Programming
QIPMO nurses participate in educational programs for state surveyors, providing both annual statewide training and regional training that focuses on clinical topics and the MDS/RAI process.
The goal is to provide education for surveyors that is consistent with the information presented to nursing home staff as part of QIPMO.
QIPMO nurses also participate in statewide provider meetings conducted and sponsored by the Division of Aging.
In 2000 and 2001, provider meetings were held in various cities throughout the state.
There was a one-day session sponsored by the Department of Health and Senior Services (DHSS) in which information about the regulatory process was discussed.
At the meeting, which was attended by several hundred providers, the QIPMO nurses spoke about their program, which is strongly endorsed by DHSS staff.
Best Practices Program
The Best Practices Program is administered by Central Missouri State University and is unaffiliated with the state survey agency, although it is supported by state funds.
A statewide committee, which includes seven representatives from each of the two provider associations and several staff from the state Ombudsman's office, reviews applications from facilities.
The committee determines the topics and solicits applications.
Thirty facility practices were nominated in 2001.
These nominated practices are published and disseminated by the university.
Until last year (when there was no conference), award winners were recognized at the Governor's Conference on Aging.
Program Funding
There are three sources of funding for state quality improvement programs: (1) Nursing facility quality improvement fund, (2) Annual nursing facility licensing fee and (3) Civil Money Penalty fines.
The state has a bed tax based on the number of residents in each facility.
By law, a portion of the tax must be spent on quality improvement.
Because QIPMO is funded in part by facility contributions to this fund, regulations state that the use of the funds must be approved by both provider associations.
Funds from this tax may also be used for surveyor hiring and training and to purchase equipment.
There are no federal funds used for the programs.
The DHSS staff that we spoke to were too new to their positions to provide any information about whether the state had ever looked into the possibility of getting Federal funding.
They were not aware of any Federal statutes that the state might use to seek Federal funding.
It seemed unlikely that the state would fund QIPMO if not for the requirement that the state have a quality improvement program and that the funding would not go back into the state's general fund if not spent on quality improvement.
In 2000-2002, the University received a $625,947 grant for its quality improvement programs.
This was less than the $743,424 for 2000-2001, but an increase over the $492,258 that was received in 1998-1999.
Funding covers 15-20 percent of Dr. Rantz's time,  a Full Time Equivalent (FTE) for a statistician,  FTE for a research nurse, seven QIPMO nurses at  FTE each and  an FTE of secretarial support.
The grant is made to the Sinclair School of Nursing and the Biostatistics Group of the School of Medicine, University of Missouri-Columbia.
Governance of Programs
QIPMO programs are completely separate from the state survey agency and the Division of Aging provides only broad oversight, receiving summary reports of QIPMO activity which identify the number of facilities visited with no facility names specified.
All QIPMO programs and staff are the responsibility of the University of Missouri-Columbia MDS and Nursing Home Quality Research Team.
The team includes faculty in the Sinclair School of Nursing, the Department of Family and Community Medicine, Department of Statistics, School of Social Work, and School of Medicine.
Management and Staffing
Technical assistance visits are conducted by seven QIPMO nurses, with each nurse covering one of the seven geographic areas of the state.
Requests for visits are received by the program coordinator at the University School of Nursing who in turn contacts the nurse covering that particular region.
Educational programs are provided by both the QIPMO nurses and Marilyn Rantz.
Nurses meet monthly, rotating between an in-person meeting and a conference call.
The main purpose of these meetings is to be certain that they are providing consistent information.
On a quarterly basis, a nurse from one area will accompany a team in another region in a peer review process to ensure that they are providing information in a consistent manner and that the processes are following QIPMO guidelines.
The QIPMO nurses are gerontological clinical nurse specialists, some with advanced degrees, selected for their clinical expertise and general lack of knowledge of the regulatory process.
They are not surveyors, are not survey trained and not currently or in the past affiliated with the state survey agency.
